OK – I’m going to do another letter. I’ve got two songs for this one.
This time we want to see.....
Here are a few more bag filler ideas for quick and easy gifting.
to pursue:
Creating a beautiful birthday cake and helping make birthday dinner.
Our beloved 7 year-old Duke was diagnosed with an agressive form of canine bone cancer (an osteosarcoma at his right front ankle joint) in early January of this year. For the time being, he is at home with us and on pain meds to keep him comfortable. His limp gets more noticible every day and he doesn't attempt the stairs much any more. His days of running and frisbee are over. We may have just a few short days left to enjoy his big brown eyes and slobbery puppy kisses. It is obvious that he's aware he's hurting and it breaks my heart.
“Hello.”
That night around the dinner table with my Mother and Father enjoying Duck cooked with lemon and honey, I told them what the Crone had said.
Being relational means many things, but one of my most favorite is the incessant need for a sense of connectedness. With people, places, emotions – relations. It’s about a genuine fascination with the actions, feelings and motives moving around you.
2. I have a five year old son and a four year old little girl who are my whole life.
Chain Drug Stores
Earlier this month I met this guy on Grindr (lol), a 29 year old grad student. We had been chatting for well over a month without much suggestion to actually meet in person until I finally summoned the courage to do so. We've gone out on five lunch dates. On the second one, he showed me his office with a view and attempted to make a move. I sort of freaked out and he didn't push it.
It is because it is fantastically hard to help such people, young or old, without imposing a measure of compulsion which modern society finds unacceptable. These kids are what they are because nobody makes them be anything different or better.
Yes because writers for children are all as rich as JK Rowling, I suppose? It was a phenomenally ignorant column and I wrote a furious letter. They did publish it on 29th, but since they cut the last two sentences, I reproduce it in full here:
On Florence Emery I call the next,
The contagious good will, which has spread to Kmart stores around the country, appears to have its roots at a store in Michigan, where an anonymous woman reportedly paid about $500 toward the layaway accounts of strangers earlier this month.
The ‘friend’ I saw yesterday was not kind and I now feel strong enough to say not a friend. It started badly…’can i have a shower I don’t want to use my hot water’ and ended worse…if ever anyone starts a sentence ‘christmas wasn’t great as I was watching my dad die’ the response should not begin ‘well it’s alright for you’. Also if a friend says last year was a living nightmare the expected response is not…you didn’t make time for me I hardly saw you.
Word has reached Par-Chavorlem and he has two years to cover his corrupt activities. There’s a rebel group in the hills led by Rivars who is determiend to fight the ruling Nul. They’re ten feet tall and have three arms and three eye stalks. It won’t be easy. The hydrogen breathing Nul have their own cities where oxygen breathing humans have to wear protective suits.
Cool retail products (a line of home decor coming later this year!), on a budget commercial gigs, and hopefully some surprises. We feel like we are just getting going!
If I must go on about statistics, according the PEW research centre, atheists and agnostics are more likely to know more about the bible, religion, and religious history than any group of theists. Next up is Jews and Mormons. But that is why people are atheists. I am not an atheist, because I don’t understand the bible; I am an atheist, because I do understand the bible, because I do understand Christianity and Islam and Judaism and many other faiths. I am an atheist, because I am willing to study the natural world and not have my mind clouded by traditions and preconceived notions which have no evidence or reason behind them, such as a deity that magically created everything for no reason, or that fairy rings are made when fairies decide to make them for no reason.
The paradigm of mass communication was inserted in a broader intellectual plan consisting in the division of the world map based on the American strategists’ logic. The patriarch of this discipline, Wilbur Schramm (as did Leo Strauss), offered a perspective of this reductionist dimension of communication sciences based on the “good guys/bad guys” antagonism, where communism symbolised “Evil” and America symbolised “Good.” This was shared by the majority of the intellectuals and scientists supporting the US government in its fight against Soviet expansionism where neutrality was considered treason.
Everything came to a head yesterday... ( took 10 months to get seriously pissed off..- not too bad..lol)
into the bathroom, and she
a good movie on rainy days with the kids
Gemologist, trained by Todd Pletcher, is the 6-1 third choice in the morning line set by Mike Battaglia, while Hansen is the 10-1 fifth choice. Trainer Bob Baffert’s Bodemeister, which drew post position six, is the 4-1 morning line favorite, followed by Union Rags at 9-2. The other speed horses drew inside of Hansen, who will be ridden by Ramon Dominguez.
Given that it’s such a haven for music (including different genres on other nights), it’s always struck me as odd that the Cantab is so freakin’ loud. There are times there when you can’t hear yourself think, much less hear the music. Bartley presides over an impressive rack of mixing gear. If you stick around until the featured acts are done and the excellent house band takes over, the crowd thins out, and the sound improves markedly.
Here the prisoners were forced to spend their entire day, walking along the shoe-testing tracks, testing shoes for local shoe manufactures. The tracks were built by a research institute with nine types of surfaces.
We were at the World for the Princess Half-Marathon (I did say it was a fairly recent weekend, didn’t I?) and we next met several friends for our pre-race dinner at the Turf Club.
We were lucky enough to have our rehearsal dinner at our favorite local Chinese restaurant. It's family owned, super friendly, and incredibly delicious. Since we were having a full chinese buffet for our rehearsal dinner (and our 30something guest list), we though having these fun finger fortunes would be cool as favors.
My first strange photo landmark is the newly rebuilt Kanini Kanini High Life Bar and General Dealer. Longtime readers of my blog will maybe recall my sadness when I found the place had been totally demolished to make way for the new road - in this old post here. Here is its previous signage, in all its former glory, in an even older blogpost!
As king, He is all powerful.
Uhg.
Phreak: I’m so sorry for not noticing sooner, Teemo.
I pray that all I'm pouring into these little lives is for God's glory and that He'll use them mightily.
Some employees choose to deal with this stress…by just not showing up to work…
(my attempt at an Olive Oil-Rosemary Cake with Blood Orange Syrup and Mascarpone)
And now it’s Tuesday again and I’m off to gymnastics with super sore knees and ankles.
Forget the day I walked away
The end of an era
Pico De Haley (Translates to “Haley’s Beak” - Named so because it’s usually consumed quickly and efficiently, without pausing or sharing, resembling how Haley eats this dish). This salsa (technically a “relish”) is great with chips, but is also a great addition to tacos, omelets, quesadillas…and so on.
Jordan Tate - On This Site - Without context, these images constitute a disjointed survey of an unremarkable landscape. On This Site, much like Sternfelds project of the same name, is an examination of the relationship between text and image. A camera has the ability to appraise a place and give validation of its significance. The photograph carries with it the intention of photographing, the weight of purpose, and the knowledge of history. These images are an exploration of the power of text and image to canonize the non-event, the minor occurrence, the history of little import.
There was also a quake in Colorado that has some strange anomallies associated with it. This being that even though this quake was reported in the Denver Post, NY Times, Huff Post, and other local papers, it has been de-listed from the USGS.gov site.
All the tenderness
It is easy to make jokes that the left (most of the artworld) will lap up, but the sense of viewer positioning, that true ability of McCarthy to get a person involved if in no other way than getting them to leave the room (my reaction), is missing. There is nothing pathetic or noble or otherwise. That’s a tragic loss.
In this study, researchers examined whether exposure to violence could make children’s telomeres shorten faster than normal. They interviewed the mothers of 236 children at ages 5, 7 and 10, asking whether the youngsters had been exposed to domestic violence between the mother and her partner; physical maltreatment by an adult; or bullying. Researchers measured the children’s telomeres — in cells obtained by swabbing the insides of their cheeks — at ages 5 and 10.
I have an issue with Future Shop. Apparently they don’t want my money. Let me tell you two stories.
I’m still reading as Thor once again became Journey into Mystery, and back to loving the scale and scope of the stories, but let’s focus on the bad for a moment. To set up some conflict in the next crossover, Marvel needed Thor, Odin and Asgard in certain positions to race them towards the next big event. The result will no doubt be compelling, but for a moment, the hood came up and we saw the gears of the plot moving.
surely meet again,)
Q. And that's where the midwife is experienced and competent?
And finally, there are a couple canned lights in the basement that were burned out that neither of us noticed. I only noticed them when the previously mentioned light burned out. Neither of us spends too much time in the basement (cat-related) so they truly went unnoticed by us both.
And then there is the other side of it. The part I think these lyrics are really talking about. It is about our other fears…it is not about trusting the other person, it is about trusting ourselves. Will we be able to handle the anxiety of revealing our authentic selves? Will we be able to gently and compassionately handle the other person’s authentic self? And what about the good parts? Do we really deserve so much happiness? Will our self-doubt make us feel like a fraud getting benefits that we don’t deserve? Will we have enough air to breathe?
I have put the trailer up on my Tough Mudder YouTube channel and will distribute it on the given social media platforms (Mudder Nation, Facebook, Twitter).
Why mention it? Because it contrasts quite well with the comments he has been hearing from his friends in the last few weeks.
More to come.
My own involvement with innovation and entrepreneurship has been with the IT industry, and my role has been one of support, delivered with admiration. For some reason I always supposed that young people would aspire to a chosen vocation and would then hope to work for an existing company or contribute to the public sector. But of course, this is just one option; the one I knew, the one I followed. The more I stop and think, the more I realize that there are examples all around me of people who have chosen the entrepreneurial route, and some very close to me at that. How did they get their inspiration, where did they get their courage?
This beer pours to a copper/amber colour with a 1cm lemon sherbet coloured head. This is another iteration of the hopped up pacific northwest IPA that reminds people of grapefruit. This one smells great, like grapefruit rind(ish) hops. When you drink it there is a very powerful bitterness to it. It has flavours similar to grapefruit and piney gin coming from the hops in this one. Their site notes that it’s a combination of Simcoe, Citra, Centennial and other hops that delivers this bouquet. They definitely strike the right chord in this beer, making for a tasty beverage.
Yesterday was pretty flat. The only decent thing was that I found the Flemish Giant I have been looking for–for about 9 years–pretty much since Wubbies (That’s right, I named my blog for a rabbit.) the bunny of all house-trained, swimming, traveling, dog-trapped in a bunny bodied animals passed on. After there was no more Wubbies, I was pretty much like, “Can’t bring him back, might as well go for the next best thing.” (Wubbies was born on my birthday. He was a miracle. He was pretty much my first fur baby as a married person. I cried for like a month straight when he died. Loved him–and no critter has EVER gotten into my heart that much till Saint.) Hense, the search began for the PERFECT Flemish Giant, a blue. I just LOVE blue animals. Yesterday, I found him–of all places on hoobly; and half an hour away. Not 3 hours away. Turns out MOH has to do a job near there and can pick him up today.
“Oh heavens no! Only some. Anyway, they were out looking for trouble, and they thought that they had found it. “Nice dress,” one of them said, grabbing my Gi by the sleeve. I could feel the blood rage building deep within my bones! “Oh you pitiful fool!” I replied, tugging it away. ”I would have you know that this is a Gi for my Karate class, and I will not stand idly by while you besmirch it’s honor!” With that, I drew my fist back and delivered a stinging Ukigawa Shinawobi straight to his temple. Needless to say, he went down like a sack of most dishonorable potatoes, and I turned my attention to the enemy directly to his left. I delivered a thundering Kinawabi Okigowo to his insteps, and then proceeded to Yoshimitsu his nerve ganglia. Hard. He spun in the air several times and then fell flat on the ground. By then, his ally had swung a clumsy haymaker in my direction. I struck him with a swift Kinobobi Yoshimwubikimiatsu before he could connect, stunning him a creating an opening for a full Yokigowo Kimosabe strike, which I executed perfectly, dislodging several of his teeth before he too struck the pavement. Unfortunately, some of his teeth landed on my Gi, which I had carefully folded and laid reverently on the ground, of course (because I mean come on, who wouldn’t do that?) staining it with blood.” I finished, breathing heavily from the exertion of fabrication. Sensei Frank stared at me for a long moment.
“Why, of course you do when it is put that way! This is all you promise in the pledge—just to try to do them; and the pledge expressly says that you are not to do them whenever you think Christ would excuse you from them. Certainly no less excuse should satisfy you, pledge or no pledge” (Clark, Christian Endeavor, supra, p. 245).
It was a lot, but we are thankful that she did not present anymore symptoms for Meningitis, it was a scary week, but we are home!
A sky I’ve flown, a street I ran
Every once in a while, it’s a good idea to skim through your inbox and glean some wisdom from the heavy hitters. You can usually figure out why some emails made it to your inbox, whether they got your attention, or if they use a subject line technique that you think is something you can totally replicate. Here on the happy side of my spam filter, my inbox was peppered with goodies like these:
But I've been watching a lot of TV food shows and I've really been craving the kinds of comfort foods I used to love back in the P.V. (pre-Vegan) days. For me, that means savory, fried, and greasy appetizers. For me, that also meant wearing size 24 pants.
It's just hard to measure progress without a scale, because my mind plays tricks on me. Between that and the lingering irritation with my inability to get down to a healthy weight really frustrates me to no end. I didn't expect to magically be skinny, but after busting my butt for 2 years, I never thought I'd get stuck before I even hit a healthy BMI. I know I'm not an angel, I still eat unhealthy food on occasion or drink. But I eat my calories, I eat healthy, and I workout 5 times a week. Something doesn't add up... It's just that after 2 years, I really wonder if anything will work.
His gums were sore for about a week.
As they get older and the gifts get more expensive, it's hard to maintain a 'simple' perspective. But, this year... it worked. They each received one thing they really wanted, and them some small things they needed and/or could wear. They really had the most fun shopping for gifts for each other, wrapping them just right, and then enjoying the reaction received. Gracie in particular, loves Christmas. She had the most fun for weeks accumulating just the right thing, and making the most beautiful cards.
*I contacted BPI and asked them for permission to use their bacon cheeseburger graphic, and I mentioned a few other statistics from them. I was in no way compensated for this post. I do feel bad, however, for the hundreds of people who are probably going to lose their jobs because of media hysteria. Demand for BPI's products has already decreased to the point that 3/4 of their plants are closed for at least short-term.
This poem blew in, took root,
You also need to send an essay on the following theme:
All Scores:
Be aware of your dominant spiritual path now, a path influenced by your personality. It is important that your friend have some experience and sympathy with your path, even though he or she may not be traveling on it as centrally as you. In fact, someone with sympathetic yet critical experience of different paths is best of all: such a friend can help attune you to different possibilities you may be ready for, and call attention to possible deceptions.
Most kilometers we made on small rural roads. We’ve seen beautiful places, such as Spa and Charleville. Rural roads offer so much more than highways!
I said: "Yeah. I dunno."
Dear Heavenly Father, thank You for Your Word that instils disciple in me. I have the ability to make quality decisions and stick with them, irrespective of the contrary conditions that may tend to dissuade me. As I exercise myself in Your Word today, I’m disciplined to do what it says and stand by every decision I make in Jesus Christ Name Amen!
Yeah, yeah, i complain, but i still prefer a rainy day in Tokyo to a sunny one in Copenhagen.
1 1/2 cups white choc chips (can also use milk chocolate if you want regular chocolate)
Click here to go to the programme. The whole thing is worth listening to, but it's the last ten minutes which concern childrens' book, so it you want to concentrate on that, you can slide the cursor along.
- If the camera enforcement is not about money, shouldn’t the penalty be community service, etc.?
After seeing a tiny watercolour done by my aunt M for me one Christmas, my mother in law slipped next door and brought back a similar sized one she had been given too. It was quite different, a sober and peaceful landscape, while mine was a bright vase of flowers. My parents were touched to see them side by side. They hadn't been aware of my aunt M's gifts.
“Ummm... just to apologise, sorry.”
Newsflash- you can have up to 6 (I think it's 6) Nooks on the same account, so I hooked my student ones up to my account... but when I realized they'd be able to access my "US Weekly" and read about Snooki being preggers... well, I had to set up a classroom account for my classroom Nooks! :) So, once the protectors go on tonight, they can start using them tomorrow!
Rangpur Limes:
and if you can't walk/run - you can STILL register - all you have to do is SLEEP!
In medium sauce pan heat brown sugar and butter over medium heat until the butter melts and the mixture is smooth, stirring constantly.
The risk of having an IQ lower than 70, the official demarcation for being classified as "retarded," increases by an astonishing 400 percentamong children of cousin marriages. (Similar effects were seen in the Pharaonic dynasties in ancient Egypt and in the British royal family, where inbreeding was the norm for a significant period of time.)
Grease the muffin moulds. Put that poori in a muffin mould and make sure to press it properly on the bottom and the sides. Bake it in that preheated oven at 180C for 20-25 mintues or till they turn golden brown in colour. Let them cool completely before using them. You can also store them in an airtight container for further use.
I have watched a couple of their reality shows. (Okay, I admit it: I do watch sometimes as my brain is defusing from all-day real problems that are not seen on the K’s shows).
Elizabeth jumped into the cruiser and softly said, ”Sugar! I love you so very much, and I want you to be complete sure about how I feel.” Jerry smiled and said, “Liz, I know you love me. I love you too. Where is all this coming from?” Elizabeth grabbed Jerry and kissed him passionately. It was their most erotic moment together. It is easy to imagine how aroused Jerry became. Just as they pulled away from each other, Elizabeth opened her jacket to show Jerry her eagerness to be his first.” Jerry never said another word. Without any conversation, it was nearly automatic. The love-making wasn’t questioned nor was their location thought of. As soon as it was possible Elizabeth placed one of her high hill shows on Jerry’s police radio, triggering their entire love-making session to be broadcast across the county. This is when Elizabeth forgot herself what her true intentions were. After an hour of prime time panting and sighing, Elizabeth and Jerry consummated their relationship and found themselves de-flowered. Unaware of Elizabeth Upon returning to the police station, Jerry was met with a round of applause. Although the religious community wasn’t happy about the situation, there was never another “Creek Virgin” comment. And Jerry received the “Up and Coming award” presented by the local newspaper. It’s one thing when people think something, it’s even better when they know it to be a fact. Innocence is precious, even more so, on the Creek.
with the last of his words,
“On the light side everyone thinks they are the most important, that their own understandings, or their group’s understandings, are the key. There’s a diversity of cultures and opinions, so there is competition, diffusion, and no single focus.
Do you ever feel like you’re going through the motions while you’re at the lowest point you can be at? It is so easy to keep making excuses while you’re lying on the ground with your face lying in a puddle of mud, telling yourself and others that you’re trying and hoping to get out of the rut that you’re in. Are we really trying to get out of that position, or are we wallowing in the mud, using it as a shield and excuse for when we aren’t doing things. I’d say that I fit right into that description, and it is on my own accord.
Five Ten Burger sez Hey yous! We’re headed to 15th and Harrison today then to OTG Berkeley!
What I’ve learned in my personal life, is that acting upon, or encouraging the homosexual feelings puts a wedge between God and I. When I allow that sin to take over, it literally takes over. Then I’m generally back to square one with opening myself up to Jesus and running back to Him.
Do not brood over your past mistakes and failures as this will only fill your mind with grief, regret and depression. Do not repeat them in the future.
in which I was dazzled, carrying my anxiety to love.
I am of course lying.
So here goes…
Which side are you on? Vamps, or Pats ?
12 New Town Animal
Q: What does your position entail?
More blankets haha, but hey if you are thinking of swaddling your baby, this is the best that you can have. I live in Texas, so during the day if they want to have a nap I use this one instead. I use this as a stroller blanket as well and now I even rolls one up and put it underneath Winston's neck so he can breath easily (due to his laryngomalacia condition).
He's a singer and an actor.
I think it’s kind of healthy to take a step back and see where I’m headed in the most ambiguous of ways.
Thank you, Gayle, for being the first interviewee here.
I finally got to the second half of our summer trip in Texas. After that I will move onto our time in Tokyo and then a few posts about Bali. It’s taking a while for me to catch up with the posts from our vacation and it’s not easy! I can’t wait to start writing about Jakarta again! I would like to thank those who have left me with comments in June and July during my vacation. Thank you so much for your comments!! I always read your comments and they mean a lot to me. I am sorry that I don’t always have the time to write you back, but I treasure each one of your comment!
When it was obvious that no chickadee babies were in the nest, I cleaned out the house... washed it... let it dry... and opened it back up for business. It still took this couple almost a week to decide on the place. I think she expected his help in building the nest, but his lame attempts ended up in pine needles being stuck in at the last moment; therefore, they simply stuck up and out the edge of the opening in a random way -- not tidy -- and were no help at all. No, the male spent most of his time fluttering at the window, pecking at the other male bluebird he saw as competition and peering in at us in the den (wanting mealworms). I think she expected him to either sit on the eggs while she hunted for food or bring her food. He didn't do either. I started in with the mealworms and she quickly learned that she would have to feed herself, he wouldn't do it.
-----The Golden Eagle
“Mama’s tummy. It’s moving.”
The Powerpoint is approximately 18 slides and makes a great intro tool to discuss these key Christian figures. Perfect for high school or college classes/ groups, and any adult group (bible study, mens group, womens group, etc). (Purchasing the book is not required in order to receive this Presentation)
I had tears of laughter rolling down my face.
By far my biggest complaint was due to lack of proper communication. In one word I would describe the communication with this clinic as horrible! You are never able to talk to a person and you must leave a message (and only 1 message per day). The average time I waited for a return call was 24-36 hours. There are times within a cycle that you need to talk to someone within a few hours. When I expressed this concern I was met with excuses and a lack of care for the situation.
It's not working.
2) Being able to speak into a box in the palm of your hand and talk to another person on the other side of the planet, in a language that you can’t understand, and have the box translate for you.
Continue Below
Everything just fits together so beautifully in ways you can’t completely figure out, it’s captivating.
Anna Boshoff, daughter of apartheid-era Prime Minister H.R. Verwoerd, is the principle of the school. The children treat her like a grandmother. One of her sons, Wynand Boshoff, is head teacher. A guest speaker demonstrates an earth building technique. Wynand takes off shoes and mixes mud with the students.
This made the grain of the wood pop through and gave the bunny
I know, I know, you don't pay attention to polling numbers which show an overwhelming number of your constituents who believe your wrong. That number is only rising. When you're recalled, along with your 8 Republican buddies, I'm willing to bet you will wish you had paid more attention to the polls and the voters of Wisconsin, despite your recent comments to the contrary.
For the closure, I punched a small hole in the flap and face of the envelope, cut circles using the Spellbinders Presto Punch Circle Die and inserted miniature silver brads. Then, I attached a jute string and sealed the envelopes!
05 - Bloody Reunion 04:01
The countdown to game time has started. Puppy Bowl starts at 3:00pm ET and the main event SUPER BOWL XLVI begins at 6:30pm ET.
to drive her own car, he, an insistent old man, compares his
from the wharves,
I said, "Yeah. But I don't have any interesting ideas."
We also spotted a front-facing camera, a very visible proximity sensor and a large speaker across the bottom of the phone (with connectors that might fit into a dock). The rear camera has a flash. The headphone socket is on the top, along with a microphone for noise cancellation.
It shuts us in alone with God.
Original Release Date: 2012
Hurt both ways
It was. Writing my thesis was one of the hardest things I've ever done. The only thing I can liken the effort to is training for a marathon. I spent 6 months writing my thesis...the product of 2 years of graduate research. The last few weeks have been so unbelievably difficult. I've been in the nonstop writing phase for almost 3 weeks now and last week, I just cracked. There's only so long you can desensitize yourself to the horrific things that are going on around the world when you're writing about them around the clock.
I will post pictures of some of the lovely creations later on after I have given them, don't you worry...and I will even include a tutorial!
I've also had some of my Weight Watcher Bloggers
Whether it's Irish or not, it's got more flavor than the usual alternative: green-dyed Miller Lite. Do you really want to drink crap like that? Look, if you don't like stout, Smithwick's is a pretty good amber (and still 4.5%), even the newly reformulated Coors-brewed Killian's is 4.9%, and it is, I'm happy to report, much tastier than it had become in its debased days.
CH: Yes, but those milongueros had respect, delicacy and sensibility. It was totally different. I know my role is contradictory, because I also collaborated in generating this young movement. In its moment I got tired of the strict milonguero codes that didn't correspond with my time and to rebel I tried to make my way. Today I'm a milonguero again (laughter). I'm against the people who do not cabecear (nod), who don't have codes or respect. The value of tango has been diluted. That is why I say that many dancers are lost, they barely hold on to each other to dance and for two hours like zombies, it is very sad.
One good mother is worth a hundred schoolmasters.--George Herbert
My avatar isn’t really a character in Jack Vance’s novels; he’s a fictional literary source. His words appear as citations in footnotes, or in lengthy quotes used as chapter headings.
The Phillies won, that’s reason enough to give them the second spot in this column. In a devilish way I’m actually hoping that the Phillies struggle throughout the season just to see how many bandwagon fans are left if they don’t make the playoffs. I just don’t see how that can happen though if Cliff Lee can come back from his DL stint close to completely healthy. The future of the NL East (Nationals, Marlins) are still a year or two away from becoming a serious threat, though you could probably talk me into the Nationals making a run at the division or at least the wild card this season.
Go here and read of an experiment:
Maybe 'Gay Masses' will appear in the heart of Soho
Spiritual Path
“I’m afraid he’s out and about at the moment. He said he had some business or other to attend to, but I’m sure he will be back by nightfall, as he usually is. I can leave a message for him if you wish,” said Hagan in good humor.
Unlock “Mission 7″ in Mission Approach Get at atomic a 1-star baronial on all levels of every mission in Mission Levels 1-6
I’ve never gotten a job because my previous work experience was particularly relevant, but rather because I learned how to spin my past experience to make it seem relevant. This doesn’t mean I lied, but instead concentrated on tasks in previous positions that were applicable to the job I wanted to get. If your current job is much different from the one you want, think about anything and everything you’ve done at your current job that’s out of the ordinary. Often times you’ll find examples of things that relate to the job you want because you were always excited to do that kind of work if it presented itself where you are now. If not, you can always start creating relevant experience now so you can use it when you’re on your interview. For example, if you work in a non-creative field but want to become a designer you would have plenty of opportunities. If you make lots of graphs and flow charts, finds ways to make them more attractive. If your company is having an outing, ask to design the flyer. When I worked in customer support, I used to create posters about inside jokes in the office or images based on funny things customers said. Sometimes I’d show these at interviews if I needed to demonstrate my Photoshop skills. As silly as that sounds, it not only demonstrated my capabilities but also showed how close I was with my team. When you put yourself into you work, you’ll find that your seemingly irrelevant experience can easily be tailored to most of the jobs you’ll apply for. You may have to start lower than you’d like, but if you work hard you’ll work your way up pretty quickly.
Stoney Creek Brewing Company Stoney Creek Vanilla Porter
“The man next to me said he was going to emigrate he couldn’t bear it any longer.”
Like many people during the referendum campaign when I am confronted by someone asking for my view on the great issue of the day I say, “It’s pronounced scone” and wander off in the opposite direction. However, it appears that this view is controversial with many campaigners arguing that I should not be in favour of “scone” but should prefer the pronunciation “scone” instead.
and can you believe it's the 27TH?! three more days and G45 announces the new DT. I'm so nervous and excited and NERVOUS. I'm about to pee myself.. really.
The first section of the prescribed reading begins with Nietzsche explaining that ‘ressentiment’ is the beginning of the ‘slave revolt’, and that it is a force which creates moral values.
19Thirteen towns with their grass-lands were given to the children of Aaron, the priests.
(that’s obviously not my picture). But I love the reformer. It’s completely different from the mat classes. I get such a good workout. Sweating! Buckets! I’ve lost 7 inches and about 9 pounds (mind you I’m loosing baby weight and nursing too) from the end of May to the end of July. 8 weeks. That’s 16 sessions. That’s it! AND! The most exciting of all for me, I can not only touch my toes, I can touch the floor with my fingers and palms! That’s So cool! So cool! I’ve never been able to touch my toes in. my. life.
Amidst the many random postmodern bits of movie-movie business strewn throughout Jean-Luc Godard's Pierrot le fou (1965) is one cherishable bit of real-world insight, one that's now more relevant than ever in ways I'll explain below. It comes early in the film, as Ferdinand (Jean-Paul Belmondo) is driving Marianne (Anna Karina) home. Marianne turns on the radio and hears a news broadcast reporting the number of soldiers on both sides of the Vietnam War killed that day. From that instant comes the following exchange (at least, as rendered on the Criterion DVD's subtitles):
and with all that said, and all judgements aside, i was totally one of 'those' girls today: going to watch sex and the city on opening day with a giant popcorn and a diet pepsi. sometimes it just feels good to embrace the inner woman, eat junk and enjoy some Sex.
BITW will now have guest designers!! I think this will be a super fun opportunity for all of us to meet some new people and get some fresh ideas. The winners will get to be a guest designer for a word to be announced one month from their winning entry....this means the guest designers will get one month to work on their layouts or projects. We are also going to have a random guest designer position as well. I will randomly choose a winner from the ended challenge to be a guest designer too!! Being a guest designer is optional and is not a requirement, so if you do not have time or do not wish to participate, feel free to say no.
We have been told (true or false) that English is now taught in all North Korean schools.
So, what will you use for your album this year? What have you used in the past? Maybe you are new to these challenges and would like some ideas. Here is what I have used in all of the past challenges. Please feel free to click on the link (title) to each challenge to see that year's study.
1963 Berthold Seliger launched a rocket with three stages and a maximum flight altitude of more than 100 kilometres near Cuxhaven.
01 - sheriff and the revels - shombolar
Once we escape the fear of death, once we realize that all are created by God almighty, we will realize that no life is worth killing for and every life is worth dying for.
Airports- Port-au-Prince has one. It’s small for an international airport. I’ve flown into it, and there’s not much there. I understand it actually has capacity for nine or ten planes at a time. Planes take time to land, to offload, and to take off again. There’s things like refueling, paperwork and clearances to consider. Different types of planes require different types of equipment to offload them, and different amounts of time.
2.) Which of your characters was the most fun to write?
In the past month I have learned:
So I did and here's what I think:
Up next is Mark Ruffalo and his wife (I assume) Sunrise Coigney. First of all, Mark please go and get a haircut. I used to fancy you for gods sake! Second of all, who is this insane woman you brought along. Sunrise? Seriously? Sorry, I don't want to speak ill of your mother. The is probably nothing wrong with the dress. Maybe it's a little split personality but I can't get past the hair. Do you know who made this dress? Is it an Armani Privé?
Now there are some ladies in this guild that are simply blessed. These are the ladies that win a door prize at every meeting....the ones that win one raffle basket the first day, THREE raffle baskets the second day.....(it's legit, I worked the booth for a few hours each day--I want to take these women to the 7-11 and have them buy lottery tickets for me). Their name is drawn and everyone GROANS! Usually it's one of these ladies that wins the vendor basket.
I had changed the 5-year-old boy into a hospital gown by this time, and one of the nurses started to pick him up and carry him out of the room. I followed her and offered to help, but she said she was fine. I followed the entourage into another room, then I saw the nurse handing the 5-year-old boy to someone else through a long, tall paneless window, which I thought was odd, because I didn't know why it wouldn't be a door. I then realized that this was where I was going to be separated from my son, and I asked if I could go in, knowing what their answer would be, and they said no. The 5-year-old boy started whimpering and I grabbed his hand and said he would be fine and that the doctors were going to fix his finger and that it wouldn't hurt at all.
Update Jan 5th: There were a couple of answers I wasn’t expecting (and would need to check), but some things are fairly easy to check. Here, for example, is a simple script that will identify sessions that regularly wait for ‘log file sequential read’.
'brekkets' (cheerios)
I can already hear the reactions of some of the people at book club, and they won’t be good. It’s long and the print is small. One of the men struggles with female attitudes to sex, in my opinion, so probably won’t enjoy the bits about the female orgasm. I, naturally, will defend it on principle. He is a narrow man, a man who is prejudiced without realising it, and it has become my raison d’être of book club to disagree with his opinions. But while I know that clearly, I’m not sure how I feel about it myself.
This morning some 30 Perkasa members held a protest and conducted funeral rites for Lim outside his residence before holding another noisy gathering in Komtar.
Comic, promoter and Malcolm Hardee Award nominee Bob Slayer, who performs as part of the Free Festival, tells me he was inspired to become part of the comedy business when he read Malcolm Hardee’s autobiography I Stole Freddie Mercury’s Birthday Cake. I think what may have attracted him was another excuse for excess.
No, you’re not. You’re not doing your best. You have no real standards for yourself, you’ve lost your sense of right and wrong; but you’ve also lost your enthusiasm and passion (and so you’ve just been going through the motions), and so you are rightfully desperate to feel alive. But you don’t seem to care if you have to do wrong (or something you ought to feel guilty about) in order to feel more alive. But the problem is: the means matter! The journey matters just as much as the destination, if not more so. Because it’s in the means that we either really earn our worth (by really earning what we want in a legitimate way) or do grave injury to ourselves (by not living up to our values and what’s best in us).
In Queens, Seeking to Clear a Path Between Yoga and Islam
I won’t go into great gory detail about what my trainer says about the scale (he has an awesome essay about it though, that if he gives permission, I could always reprint here), other than to say that it “lies.” What he means by that is, no, the number you see on that thing isn’t always reflective of what you are doing. You can have WILD fluctuations in weight for a myriad of reasons. Water, being on a period for you gals, going on a pork rind bender et al etc. all have a role to play here.
Step 3: Take the picture back to your studio or lab. NOTE: This requires a studio or lab, or studiolab, which is the awesomest one. Examine them carefully with an absurdly giant magnifying glass or just use your eyes.
Sitting for two hours through an awkward (for me) musical lead my mind to random and not so random thoughts on the current and future state of the stage. The first thing is the subject itself. Sixties music. It attracts to an older segment of the population that actually spends money on the arts. It puts butts in seats, I get it and understand but it seems short-sighted. The vast majority of the audience was old, they all had a good 20 or so years on me and ok, there was a small amount of people younger than me in attendance, and they laughed and enjoyed the show, but what happens in 20 years? No way 30 or 40 people support the Ensemble. I know there are smaller stages out there taking risks, is that the key I'm missing, they are small? Will there be consolidation down the road or will the theaters relying on equity actors become a thing of the past?
I give them eternal life, and they shall never perish.
So, Chris called around some more, found a handy-man that charged $25 an hour, and got put on his list. The problem? His first available day was June 9th. My due date is May 30th. Oiy.
Fifth, it is a combination of these possibilities.
On the one hand, you want to ask if it's a bad time (right in the middle of an hour-long conversation) and if you should maybe call them back later, and on the other hand your own good manners prevent you from letting on you've noticed anything out of the ordinary.
Now Ive had pretty bad luck with wild fermentations in the past, part of me thinks this is due to the constant heat around here in Phoenix. So was I decided to do was do a "starter" using a bit of grain and some DME. I stepped it up a couple times to hopefully kill off any enterobacter in there that would cause those awful hot garbage tastes/smells. The culture seemed to be coming along amazingly well, it reeked of fruit (peaches actually!) and was slightly tart. So I pitched it into a fairly simple malt bill of some spelt, maris otter and pils. I kept the hopping light so as to mesh well with the anticipated sourness and the peaches.
Here is a photo from a Sharp/Howard family reunion in about 1933. If anyone can name more, I would be happy to update the names and information.
I refrigerated the filled donuts, but not the regular ones.
A common practice is to begin the interview with a mid-shot as the guest talks about the facts, then slowly zoom in to a close up when the guest begins talking about their feelings. This technique is popular in current affairs programs and documentaries. Don’t drag the close-up on for too long — after a while it becomes uncomfortable and makes the viewer feel that they are invading the speaker’s personal space. Watch television interviews and learn to judge the timing of these moves.
You’re one month on in the middle of May.
Our friend Kate just passed one of her nursing exams...we gave her one of our stethoscopes as a congratulatory gift. She laughed. Then she asked us if we knew how long a red blood cell lived.
And thanks to the artists of St Marks Rainbows, Harrogate for their lovely thank you card.
copyright 2004 Lisa Call
Now since, it has worn a little more,
Arrange each fig half on a goat cheese medallion, flat side up. Garnish with mint leaves.
How do you want to be remembered? I hope I can inspire people with my adventurous spirit!
Cute does not begin to describe the performance they gave. It's not a competitive squad, it's full of kids who haven't cheered before now, the whole point of it is to have fun--but you could really see a marked difference from autumn, when they first began practicing, and tonight's final show.
Monday, after talking to my children about the Chinese New Year, I went in search for a book to share with them. I couldn't immediately find anything on Chinese New Year, but I found a fabulous book about dragons.
Back to Lizzie and Phil.
We’re hearing that the wind power generation project for the North Gower-Richmond area of the City of Ottawa is “on hold.”
it’s funny, the art is gorgeous , and you’ll love it
4.) One of the things that strikes me about groups just starting up (and who often have some idea about what they’re doing), is that they really have to struggle with figuring out how to go about things. Established traditions have tried things and figured out what works and what doesn’t; essentially you don’t have to reinvent the wheel. In traditions, there have probably been a few generations who have already figured these things out, so you don’t have to. This give you the freedom ti learn a good fundamental basis to work on, and then if you like, use this knowledge and experience to work things your way, without reinvention of material that has been there all along.
Use the large oval punch to punch out an oval with printer paper. You need something thin so the layers don't get too thick and make it too difficult to punch. Add a little bit of adhesive or Dotto to the punched oval and place it on one of the pink top notes where you want your handle to be.
My only release from this pain is when I quit or get fired, which puts me into a different state of pain where even fewer of my needs are met, and then the cycle begins all over again.
At the ground level trees were swaying like they had been hit by a seizer. Dogs ran in search of safe place. The deserted streets began to fill with daily life.
In the second place, writing a review shortly after I read a book/ watch a movie is the best way I know of reflecting on it. It provides a neat little wrap-up to the whole book reading/ movie watching experience, kind of like having to produce one of those book reports that were so ubiquitous, especially in my elementary school days.
I would love to check out your "Year in Review".
16. Midnattsol – Lament
Ms. Pitts was every school boy’s dream. This happened in the seventies. When a teenage boy made out with his teachers he was called a stud, not a victim. Cheri’s was the only teacher, in the school, who would assign seats. Rather than allowing the kids to pick a seat at random, Cheri put the boys at the front of the class. The girls were always seated in the back of the class, as if they had leprosy. Ms. Pitts had this terrible habit of “forgetting” her underwear and felt no need to cross her legs when she sat down. The boys in class never heard a word she said when she was teaching class. They were mesmerized at the view. “Does she know what she’s doing to us?” One boy asked another. “She knows exactly what she is doing.” he replied.
The next main destination was at Eu Yan Sang in Chinatown area at 269A South Bridge Road . We were given an introduction to Traditional Chinese Medicine. This Eu Yan Sang is also special in that it has a mini-exhibition on bird-nest. I caught a glimpse of some of the tools that were used in processing bird-nests. I also learnt that the best bird-nest in the world comes from Vietnam. Sarawak, however, is one of the countries that processes the highest quantity of bird-nest.
No. The book started with the image of a king building a castle of cards. If you have mad king you have a kingdom in trouble. It begs the question of who’s running it. Enter a prime minister. It’s that simple.
Game, Set and Match to the PIGS!
6. Craisins
I have to wait for pathology reports. They can't come back any faster. So what do I do with the anxiety? I try and "offer it up". This means I offer these feelings and doubts to Jesus on the cross. I just give them to Him and ask Him to unite my little baby sufferings with His holy sufferings. And by doing this, there is purpose and meaning in my trials. I think if I am to progress in my spiritual life, I must try and imitate Jesus in any way. I know He suffered and was greatly troubled in the garden. When I join my unnerving wait for test results to His Passion, my wait can become redemptive and useful and serve to draw me closer to Him. So I took all my emotional torment, cupped it in my hands, and gave it away.
The President is a commie, and a Kenyan, that’s a fact
He arose! He arose!
I do occasionally get tempted to splurge on an expensive shower gel, but most of the time I prefer to keep it budget-friendly. As long as it smells pleasant, doesn’t dry my skin out (and doesn’t leave it slippery either. That I can’t stand), and is preferably as natural as possible, we’re on. Le Petit Marseillais totally fits the bill. Oh and the funny thing? Dr. D likes it too, but he prefers green bottles just because he thinks they look more masculine. Boys…
The top background (the lightest) is the paper as it comes in the set.
Michelle Marie Henrique, 27, New York, N.Y.
Preparation time: 10 minutes
Sleep in our eyes, her and me at the breakfast table
On the plus side, the book has some beautiful illustrative plates by Tony Di’Terlizzi & some dino sketches thrown about to draw in the slipping reader.
MIRI: The state government needs total cooperation from the Orang Ulu community and its constructive input towards the proposed implementation of Baram hydroelectric dam project.
Today, I will speak on one of my beginnings. Some paths have since diverged, but I still have transferable gifts from those paths that I can use just about anywhere. Let me get to it, or this post will end up being very long.
Ahab called Elijah an enemy (1 Ki. 21:20). But he was wrong. The prophet was really his best earthly friend. If only he would have listened to God’s servant, he could have been a good king and a child of God.
We stopped at Punakaiki, which I think means “pancake rock”. Jacob got instantly ravenous at this translation. Unfortunately it was named after the geological features of the region and not the culinary options. Far off to the West, the Sun was being drowned by the Sea and it reflected everywhere in the water. The rocks did indeed look like stacked pancakes, with green honey foliage. The ever present Shag nested sporadically and easily amongst the many pancake folds. These rocks had character and each section had a name, suggested and accepted in Maori. You could make out faces, animals and shapes in the formations. We were told by an information board that the waves hitting the formations created a cacophony of blow holes. It only happens at around 1pm (so we had missed it) and is amazing, like natures wind section.
radio, may never be an oil painting or
- In Britain, in 1888, a law was passed which stated that every cyclist had to constantly ring the bell on his bicycle non-stop while the machine was moving.
They (the students) want to “wander across strange domains” but instead are trained to “obliterate”
3. Brodus Clay pinned Dolph Ziggler with a splash 6/10
I have my dining room and the table in it. Around this big slab of pine many great conversations have taken place with my children and good friends. Lots of food has been served at gatherings where we invite friends over and cook Indian food and talk and laugh. At the right angle you can see scores written from when we have played cards or Boggle or other games. Pine is good that way. It holds on to things. I may refinish this table in the Spring, but it is staying in this house because it has become an important place to me.
Camo shows through!
Hi this is Andi,
Well, I PROMISE I will be back and share how it went with 4H this year, with our food prep, our farm and more! Talk to you all soon! :)
We are also looking for everyday and very well accomplished adoptees to show adoptees we are out here and we are successful.
Eve Carpenter was having a bad enough day even before she fell through the hole in the ground.
Those goddamn cameras. The school didn’t tell anyone they were put up. They were well hidden too.
Marvel Knights Double Shot #1 – 2
I was saddened to hear yesterday (August 22, 2011) of the passing of Jerry Lieber. I had gotten to speak to him once on the phone back when I was working for Tony Bennett. He was, of course, trying to sell Tony a song. I thought, how sad and odd, that a songwriter of this stature still has to travel around, hat in hand, and hawk his songs. At the time, Tony wasn’t even hot (this was a year or so before his big comeback in the 90s). As it happens, Jerry would have his own big comeback that decade, when Smokey Joe’s Cafe became a hit show on Broadway. (This, too, is strange and unnatural. That one of America’s top songwriters, and one so very much in the Tin Pan Alley tradition, doesn’t get a Broadway show for forty years — and when he does, it is with forty year old songs. Something symptomatic there, something unhealthy).
“God undoubtedly took advantage of every opportunity to learn the laws of truth and as He became acquainted with each new verity He righteously obeyed it. As He gained more knowledge through persistent effort and continuous industry, as well as through absolute obedience, His under­standing of the universal laws continued to become more complete… until He attained the status of Godhood. He became God by absolute obedience to all the eternal laws of the Gospel” (The Gospel Through the Ages, pp. 114-15).
The image is coloured with Distress Inks.. I had to make a mix of colours to make the perfect colour for the dress.. I think I did it pretty well.. :)
After all, it is well known that Campbell was one of Blair’s key advisors when he made his controversial decision to back George W Bush’s ill-fated invasion of Iraq, which caused the slaughter of up to half a million innocent civilians in that Muslim country.
How often do we leave a church gathering and either utter ourselves or overhear someone else utter, “I really worshiped today…”?
Check out these pretties from last week! First up is this Clipboard Bling from Delight! It's a simple way to have a little fun with everyday objects for work or home. Linda used many pieces of vintage jewelry to make this shine. Check out the full post at...
Tuesday Nov 2nd was an eventful day for me. First of all I got the all clear from the Haematology Clinic and decided to go back to work the next day. Later that evening I had a call from someone called Barry to tell me that he'd just bought my speakers.
Remixed version definitely sounds better than original (rare)..
Her name was Sonya, and she worked as a barmaid at the Looking-Glass Cafe, where I sometimes go to escape and evade and avoid and elude the desperation and desolation of my lonely existence. Ah, how shall I describe Sonya? She was as lovely as the dawn, as beautiful as the dusk, and as sweet as a mango. And she had a nice smile. I was smitten.
Now the fuzzy stare from not being there on a confusing morning week
Format: Paperback, Kindle
A couple of weeks ago Kelly @ Kelly's Korner did a Show us your life about adoption and adoption fundraisers. Adoption is great, but the cost can be unbelievable. I love adoption stories!!!!! So of course I read most of the blogs that linked up that day. One that really caught my attention was a sweet couple and their puzzle fundraiser. This couple bought a 2000 piece puzzle and for each $5 someone donated they would write their name on the back of a piece/pieces. Now this puzzle is framed and hanging in their sweet baby Kate's nursery. The puzzle is framed with the back of the puzzle showing so Kate can see someday just how many people loved her. I love this idea so I am using it in my own life.
First , I just want to comment on these flowers. I showed you a picture of them in my last post and told you that they were from Joe . He gave them to me in remembrance of our First Date on March 8, 1975!
Yesterday I was in that most healthy of eating establishments, McDonalds.
It's been a busy week. Travis is working 12 hour shifts, 4:30am to 4:30pm. Callan thinks it's time to get up at 4:30am. We're up for a a little over an hour, then he goes back to bed for about an hour.
Aside from the commentary and the making of, also present is a very nice 33-minute documentary called “Remembering Barry Letts,” which traces the man’s career, and features both of his sons discussing him at length. This is a sweet, warm piece, and even though there’s nothing in it that’s “Daemons” specific, it’s a welcome addition. There’s six minutes worth of silent “amateur” 8mm film footage that was made during the original “Daemons” shoot; doesn’t sound all that interesting, yet it really rather is. The entirety of Episode One is also presented as it looked after the very first colorization test in 1992, along with a short piece on the ‘92 colorization from a show called “Tomorrow’s World.” These seem like somewhat baffling inclusions (talk about redundant!) given that they don’t reflect the current work put into this story, although the ability to do a “now and then” comparison of Episode One 1992 vs. Episode One 2012 is fairly enlightening in regards to the strides that have been made in technology over the past 20 years. (Again, here’s where a short piece on the current restoration would’ve fit in nicely.) Finally, there’s the usual photo gallery, production notes subtitle option, Radio Times listings in PDF form, and a coming soon trailer for “Nightmare
Front camera for video calling
She was standing beneath a large military-style plane with little wings and big engines. As an item of garden furniture it was large and ostentatious and not a little rusty. It had clearly seen better days and not been flown in some time. Ophelia found herself wondering if it still worked. Any enthusiast worth their salt could have told her that it was a Hawker Siddeley Harrier and that the rust and the thick stems of ivy creeping across the wings and into and through the engines were a clear indication of its inoperability, but these are but mere details and of little significance to the wider dream. Willard clearly didn’t take it out as often as he should, but no matter. That would change once she got a foot in the door and her feet under the table. A spot of polish and a little engine oil and soon they would be jaunting off to exciting places such as the millionaire resort of Morocco where he would take her on expensive shopping trips to Cartier and Tiffany in his Formula One car and sip champagne as they watched all the other Formula One drivers racing round and round in circles from the deck of his yacht moored in the most prestigious mooring spot in all of Morocco. Not that she cared one jot for motor sports, but when in Rome it paid to do as the natives do. Besides, even millionaires have to have hobbies.
In fact, if there is any piece of classical music that my mother can be said to hate, it would be Bolero. I think mom’s issue with it is that she hates the repetition of it and she hates the way it makes her heart beat in the rhythm of the drums.
As an Asian, in particular - a Tambrahm, my love for rice needs no reason, excuse or introduction. If I am told, "you really love rice, don't you?", I simply say, "Well, I am Tamilian." That justifies it all. Try as much, you can't shake off those genes and years of rice and rasam in one lifetime that easily! Given a choice between wheat and rice, I dive straight for rice, throwing the nutritionist's advice to the winds! It is this addiction that leads me to keep trying desserts that are made with rice. A whole month dedicated to rice at beyond curries gave me a chance to share this wonderful recipe I was introduced to by my neighbour.
Delivery boy Fry visits a museum dedicated to the 20th Century. He is shocked to find the fossilized remains of his pet dog, Seymour, exhibited there. For three days he protests outside the museum, until they relent and give him the fossil. Professor Farnsworth discovers that a clone of Seymour can be made from the remains. Jealous Bender grabs the fossil and throws it in a pit of lava. Fry is devastated. Seeing his master's love for the dog ("I thought you were only pretending to love him to toy with my emotions") Bender leaps in the pit and retrieves Seymour. Just as Farnsworth is about to begin the cloning process, Fry has a sudden change of heart. "Seymour went on to live a full and happy life without me", he thinks. Concluding that Seymour would have forgotten all about him by the time he died, Fry violently aborts the operation. But did Seymour forget all about his beloved master after all? NO, NOT IN THE SLIGHTEST.
I spent some time this evening researching the claim that sharia law requires four male, Islamic, adult eyewitnesses to get a rape conviction. This turns out to be true, but slightly misleading, or at least, incomplete. Sharia law, with its very severe punishments, does apparently require four male, Islamic adult eyewitnesses for the crime of zina (which includes rape, adultery, and premarital sex, and does not distinguish them clearly). In some countries, eight adult females can provide the testimony, or some combination of men and women.
Marrying colours with Constellations: Constellations have a mystic feel to them. They are intriguing drawings in the night sky and are believed to affect our moods and functions in ways unknown to mankind.
1. Spray waffle maker and preheat. In large bowl, combine flours, oat bran, baking powder, baking soda, and salt. Add buttermilk, melted butter, eggs, and honey. Stir until flour mixture is moistened (batter will be lumpy). Stir in pecans.
Can Congress change course and drop its farm subsidy of corn ethanol this year? Observers say, despite the growing calamities and the real risk of severe malnutrition, even starvation in Africa, Congress will do nothing.
As well, the winner of the March caption contest is Martha from Plowing Through Life! She has earned the coveted (lol!) spot along my sidebar for April and a little surprise winging her way via Canada Post. Thanks for your rocking line Martha and thanks to everyone who participated - all your submissions were great, but alas there can only be one winner. Check out the April Caption Contest page (under my header) for this month's quip-provoking pic :)
A deep, low chuckle escaped Christian’s lips. He began kissing her with renewed passion, both of them glad to finally be back in each others arms. Nipping at her neck as he made love to her, Christian’s fangs didn’t pierce her skin. His nips were teasing, her fingers digging into the skin on his back as she tried to push his face closer to her neck so he would bite her.
Thank you everyone for your kind concern about my pregnancy. My strength and appetite have return. I feel great and started cooking and doing house chores again. The first 4 months I really have no energy to do anything.
Nobel Week: General
We may be living 1944 years later but mankind is much the same. Many will say they serve God but are merely giving Him lip service. To them it is a kind of obligation, or it may be out of fear. Do they really know the Lord, or is He in reality, an unknown god?
Fortunately, following the turbulence of winter comes the season of activity and opportunity called springtime. It is the season for entering the fertile fields of life with seed, knowledge, commitment, and a determined effort.
And it cannot be left without saying that these bachelor groups are the ones that cause trouble. Wikipedia says:
I read several articles this week that caused my heart to break. The news has been full of articles about the Secret Service scandal in Columbia and being the political nerd that I am, I’ve read quite a few. None of them affected me as much as these two:
On the subject of entertainment:
was received from providers” in relation to physical disabilities
CRT: Cash Register Tape. Coupons that print at the bottom of your CVS receipt.
Though it will be newer and bigger, the tone won't change, says Davies. Barrowman's Jack will still be TV's only bi-sexual hero, character will still be stressed, and humor will still play a large part in the show's make-up.
Screenshot of section 14 of the Act. — Picture courtesy of Lawnet
I am happy to find a set of books that can basically make my one and two year old group last for forty weeks. I hope that they are useful to you as well.
13Steps : We made a band, 13Steps just for hardcore scene and game and we think we have been trying to keep it for real. The music of 13Steps is based on hardcore and we grabbed some spices from Punk and Metal. Simply speaking, We are trying to make the toughest songs from all genres in music.
The fact that I have been so lazy has also put a damper on my spiritual/mental well being. I feel more stressed, not as inspired, no abundance of passion throughout the day, and constantly dragging. When I started this blog I never expected it to take so much effort to be inspired and to live passionately. I wasn’t taking into consideration the multitude of days in a row where I am in a crummy mood and nothing is going right for me to write about.
Tools & Home Improvement Product Reviews Blog ISUA (toolsisua.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
The people reply:
“Hey… I have the night planned…okay?” His half-smile once again melted her resistance.
Discarded feather
Overall, I found the series to be a strange mix of horror, action, gore and mystery. The fact that I didn’t fully comprehend the plot until episode 6, made me think that this was an attempt at Magical Realism and after episode 6, I thought that it was still a rather peculiar story. The animation, especially the fight scenes, were beautifully done much like the designs of the characters (in the other world) and the scenery, topped off by an appropriate soundtrack the series was a rather good watch.
If you look closely, you can see the wall seperating Jerusalem from the West Bank.
I said “Well, If we are supposed to put no-one before God, why did you tell us to pray to the pope? Isn’t he just a man? Why would we want to pray to a man, wouldn’t that put us in defiance of the first commandment?”
"I just think people really don't want to hear the truth They instead attack you on your character, your writing style, and not your argument. They distract from what you just said by saying you can't spell, or that you should have put a comma there," said Ziegler.
(As when, for instance, she discovered,
I visited Keavy at Brooklyn’s Brownstoners Flea Market and had a Kumquat strawberries and cream mini cupcake. Two bites of strawberry-wow flavor. And then onto Batch in the West Village. At Mr. Ong’s suggestion, I tried the carrot and salted caramel cupcake, which was, yes, divine. But the new strawberry frosting/rhubarb filling is even better. Such vibrant, fruity flavors. And the cake and frosting have that beautiful home-baked texture and density.
A man
In a bowl, beat egg and milk. Stir in cheese, oats, onion, and salt. Add venison and mix well. Shape into 8 loaves and place in a greased 9x13 baking dish. Spread with ketchup. Bake, uncovered at 350 for 45 minutes, until meat is no longer pink.
Jack Oakie’s role here is very similar to his turn as sidekick to Spencer Tracy in Wellman’s Looking For Trouble the previous year. Once again he has a lot of comic moments but always with a strong buddy relationship underlying the humour – and you feel that he is always looking out for his more volatile friend and checking he is all right. According to the same review at the imdb that I’ve already referred to, the original intention was for Oakie’s character to be shot dead by the villainous Smith, but it was felt audiences wouldn’t put up with the comic actor being killed and so this scene was cut before release – however, this deleted scene apparently survives. It would be fascinating to see it.
07. ...And Then The Liver Screamed "HELP!"
There are two problems with this order:
And now, nearly 17 years later, I can still hear grandpa’s laughter, still smell grandma’s coffee, still shiver at the memory of how cold those rivers were. Their little hut is forever etched in my memory.
Today my Dt card is image from Robyn Fetish store called "Belinda Bunny" thanks for letting me use the image.
I took the Barleywine off-tap to save it for later.
Its time for a change, Americans of all races need to their quality of living seriously and fight for jobs, development, against poverty,and crime. Its time lawmakers and the evil men who oppress us are forced to fix the disparities in income and many of the social ills of American life.
Tony Blair, in the last bit of his time in office, is trying to get British police war-time powers to stop people and ask them where they’re going, where they’re coming from, and who they are, according to the New Zealand Herald. Police already have the power to stop and search people.
I don’t know how I feel about it at the end…I’ll probably dwell on that tomorrow…
May you have strength, and
September 18 – October 5
Back to more artistic pursuits though with the 1932 conversion of the venue into a full-time movie theatre, Cinéma Apollo, which was first renovated in 1952 ahead of being demolished and rebuilt once again in 1972 as a multi-screen complex: Cinéma Ariel. Fifteen or so years later, the complex was taken over by the ever-expanding Union Générale Cinématographique group, more commonly known in France as UGC. And, in 1997, the building was modernised once again, resulting in the fifteen-screen UGC Ciné Cité with which people are familiar today, the main façade of which also shows tell-tale signs of its theatre and concert-hall past!
There are many fresh egg noodle with nice ramen-broth in a package for 2 to 3 person you can get about $3.75 to $5 at any Japanese super-market.
With today’s ever changing technology, it’s sometimes hard to keep up with the latest and greatest improvements. From bigger and faster iPods to smaller and smaller laptops, technology is always on the move. And in most cases, the new gadgets and services help us connect with customers better and improve the user experience.
Marley thought about it, his mother hadn’t liked it much either but what was he expected to buy with five dollars a week allowance?
grilled s'mores
Memory Box Dies=
Two new members joined us yesterday and were settled in and made to feel welcome by Fran, our charming 'welcome committee'.
their legacy’s too hard to take
Hadas hinkis - Easy traffic
We’re told not to sleep around with people, but many of us understand the toll of that life style, but keep silent on the subject.
And for those that understand Spanish, this is a fantastic read. And speaking of double standards, the answer to this question posed by those biased people at Cuatro (the non-verbal language of Cristiano: taunting or character?) is taunting when Cris does it, character when anyone else does it. Obviously. I’m sorry, these things make me mad.
Even as I read “The Race for Theory”, I wondered what Christian’s motives were. She did not speak of herself as a (presumably) heterosexual, although I recognize her class from her alignment with Third World feminism (Christian 2129). Christian only addressed her perceived differences, which seem to be in relation to white, First World men. Sexuality is a non-issue for her, as a heterosexual and a possible heterosexist (never mind her cissexist assumptions). She condemns those who believe that their identities are apolitical or neutral and yet she fails entirely to address the gay rights movement that was concurrent with the Black Arts Movement. Although her anti-theory translates nicely from race and gender to sexuality, she fails to take it there. Her anti-theory seems to bind together those who are not white, not male, not First World, by their differences, which is contrary to what it has set out to do. In not recognizing the commonality of her heterosexuality, Christian risks ignoring an inextricable aspect of her identity because of prejudices she herself condemns.
I cried.
Speaking about Guilty to a fellow writer Jean Paulhan, Bataille said it concerned the “relationship between eroticism and mysticism,” adding “but the book considers a great deal more than that.” And it certainly does. It documents Bataille’s resolution to throw himself into a state of “headlessness” – a key concept in his general philosophical outlook – through drinking, madness, obscenity, cruelty and extreme sex, all of “life’s majestic horrors”. Guilty, however, is one of the texts which most notably marks the beginning of Bataille’s introspection triggered by the death of his lover Colette Peignot, who passed away of tuberculosis in 1938. Writing about it years later in “Notice Autobiographique” Bataille described it as “a death that tore him apart”. Unable to completely let go of the object of his loss, or relinquish the ties through morning, he merged her into the structure of his own identity, making Peignot an iconographic feminised ideal of the excess-pursuing, tormenting self. Peignot’s death was concurrent with the breakdown of many of Bataille’s closest friendships – predominantly over disagreements about the darker elements of his work – which left him largely isolated. It is therefore perhaps no surprised that Bataille himself once surmised Guilty, written during this particular time, as “violently dominated by tears, violently dominated by death”. Looking over some of his earlier entries in the book, Bataille muses: “Reading these fragments from last year I remember I felt death – a chill in my soul. It wasn’t anguish but a chill, an exasperation with the fact of being me, an exasperation with the lack of happiness and excess…”
Ahh! Liquid Heaven!
Have you given thoughts to your steps lately? Do you need to? If not, pray and ask God to help you do just that...and then shut down all the commercial messages before it is too late. Antonyms of stubborn are: meek, tame, and yielding. And for God there is no better way to approach. Taking time to heed warning and be aware of our weaknesses will not only save us from sinking, but with God's help, it'll keep our kids afloat, too.
The Oh Katy diapers include both a newborn size insert and regular size insert. These can be used together for more absorption for heavy wetters or for overnight. The regular sized insert can be folded over and snapped (see second picture) to use for a newborn. The inserts had pretty good absorption, though I haven't ever used microfiber inserts before, I only have used cotton/bamboo blends and combinations.
So, last week heralded my final foray into the core career path that I chose as an idealistic teenager, my role as a communications manager came to a close. I have moved into the realm of economic development and government policy research, my first assignment is presenting a range of perspectives on my research (so far) at conferences, so today I’m enroute to Melbourne.
keeping cool.
Not for me, for my child. She has one. A cute bike helmet with pink rabbits on it. I think I'm going to start putting it on her in the morning and not taking it off until bedtime. The poor kid bangs her head on stuff all.day.long.
And here are all eight make and takes that we made at the show. Top to bottom, left to right: memory box, Christmas album, Christmas ornament, Christmas gift tag, Merry Christmas card, snowman Christmas card, Halloween goodie bag tag, Christmas gift tag.
Olivier.
And that’s your definition of Too Big To Fail right there: the biggest banks are not only getting bigger, but their risk exposure is now at a new all time high and up $5.3 trillion from Q1 as they have to risk ever more in the derivatives market to generate that incremental penny of return.
My contribution to Kotto Week is Luchi De Jesus' soundtrack from Friday Foster, the 1975 Arthur "Detroit 9000" Marks film featuring Pam Grier and the man of the week Yaphet Kotto.
How true, this is a universal truth
I think a lot of us do. We are listmakers by nature. Perfectionists by trade in a profession that pushes us to push others to be perfect.
They walked down to the water's edge and began to make their way along the stone bank.
social status and labor. I decided to stop visiting her when I was 12.
So clearly, I wasn't thinking it completely through, please forgive me.
What caught my attention: In picture books and middle grade fiction, Kelly looks for clever writing, a good sense of humor, stories that stretch a young reader's imagination, and an authentic voice, and fresh ideas.
No matter how many times I’d move, my thoughts always found me questioning everything I had listened to during the day. Nothing went filtered without a doubt or at least one-hundred different possibilities of what the expression could have meant. I took up hermeneutics, became a scholar of old religious texts for a while, and interpreted them through the lenses of what I thought other religions would say about them. That is, until one morning, when I could have sworn the sun was laughing at me and singled me out by creating a spotlight around my hammock on the beach in Cartagena that the mailman walked up to me in his tire-soled sandals and handed me a postcard. On the cover was a drawing of ALF. The back read as follows:
(he then called A Uncle Mask for the rest of the day, and laughed and laughed)
Is your favorite color blue? If so, enjoy your privileges…
After visiting the USA the mission arrived in the UK and arrived in London where they split into smaller groups to visit the cities of Liverpool, Manchester, Glasgow, Edinburgh and finally Newcastle before reconvening in London. On October 21 the party arrived in Newcastle and stayed in The Royal Station Hotel which still operates in the city today. Understandably the arrival of a delegate from the strange and far off land of Japan was more than newsworthy and it was reported by local newspapers;
Girl Card
How can you NOT love that man!?!?!?!?
with distress ink tattered rose and victorian velvet.
The connection began when Obama was at the New York Public Library and came across the latest copy of Community Jobs, a publication of six to eight pages that listed employment opportunities in the social-­justice and social-services fields. One listing was for a group called the Developing Communities Project, which needed a community organizer to work in the Roseland neighborhood on the South Side of Chicago. Right city. Right line of work. Obama sent in his résumé and cover letter, something he had done many times before with no luck. Two matters left unstated in the ad were that Kellman, who oversaw the project, specifically wanted an African-American for the job, and that he was getting desperate.
I layered the image panel over a lime and white ric rac patterned paper strip with a notched end. The strip’s set on a gold dot embossed panel, again layered on a red mat for a nice contrast. I used the same red/gold combination on the strip I set across the card base, then layered the panel on top at an angle.
Lines are staggered. People are not allowed to bunch up into inviting targets for a bomber who has gotten this far.
On my to-do list:: Gather up tax stuff & turn in, laundry, house in general needs HELP, would love to paint the bathroom this week.
5. Recipies
When we were looking for pendants we wanted something unique that wasn't too over the top, especially in the price arena. I saw some of the most amazing outdoor lights, but when it comes down to it, we just weren't willing to spend the big bucks on something that hangs outside. It's crazy how expensive those things are!
Storm
Later, she also visited Pandher village, the native place of Ranjit Singh who was seriously injured in the firing. He is recuperating at the Amritsar Civil Hospital where his condition was stated to be stable.
to land
Yellow, yellow is the sun
Avery is a great helper. When we say it's time to clean up she happily helps to her toys away in their bins.
The distribution by the Constitution of the powers of government to the Legislative, Executive, and Judicial Departments operates, by implication, as an inhibition against the exercise by one department of the powers which belong to another, and imposes upon each of the three departments the duty of exercising its own peculiar powers by itself, and prohibits the delegation of any of those powers except in cases expressly permitted by the Constitution. The principle of the separation of the powers of government is fundamental to the very existence of a constitutional government as established in the Philippines patterned after that of the United States of America. The division of governmental powers into legislative, executive, and judicial represents the most important principle of government that guarantees the liberties of the people, for it prevents a concentration of powers in the hands of one person or class of persons.
Joyce Ann Carpeneto, 40, New York, N.Y.
now, we are in that awkward stage of having it rented out because my grams is the only one still alive,
Google does all kinds of cool things for their employees. Food is free at Google and there are (I think) over twenty restaurants to choose from. You can also bring your dog to work on a pet friendly shuttle from SF and they have those cool indoor slides which, sadly, are no longer available to guests as the floor where the slide originates is now designated as a no-visitors area. Good thing I was able to ride it when I did. It was AWESOME and FAST!
F.F. Bruce
To your response.
With the new anti-labor Free Trade Agreements in place local economies have become enmeshed into the global economy this is the one world order of business creating displaced workers in foreign lands many come to the USA pushing wages down. Politicians use illegal immigrants to create racial hysteria to divide and conquer the labor market such as Bill O’Reilly and Shane Hannity on Fox News promoting racial tensions the “Brown People” are taking your job. These illegal undocumented workers are peasants, the very poor, who are looking for a better life in the USA; in their respective countries they have no human rights, and they have no legal rights as citizens. In the USA they get abused by politicians, the justice system, and by the people. This is a wedge issue that global corporations use to conquer and divide the workforce creating xenophobes; when in reality this is the answer to free trade. http://economix.blogs.nytimes.com/2010/09/29/look-to-europe-to-understand-why-this-u-s-recovery-is-jobless/
Have you ever been in a store or somewhere when you hear a child saying mom, mom, mom, mom over and over and over again. Then to hear the mom finally yell WHAT?
...then he finds out that old dad is also an arm-wrestler and picks up extra money going here, there and everywhere by defeating opponents with his mighty arm. That doesn't change their relationship much but hey: his dad arm wrestles. Wow.
My Faith In My (website Newt Exploratory 2012)
However, consider this: no clinical evidence exists for it, only anecdotes. Also, toxicity studies show that ClO2 (MMS), in doses lower than Jim recommends, is a neurotoxin and a thyroid toxin. These both are worrying. The fact that Jim sells MMS, or at least used to, and now instead makes money from others with his book, DVDs, courses and royalties from other MMS suppliers, then lies and says he makes no money from MMS, is even more worrying, especially since we’re talking about what is supposedly a medicine. A pseudo medicine that is being targeted specifically at those most vulnerable, those with cancer, AIDS and other life threatening, horrible illnesses. Even worse, it’s targeted at those with chronic illnesses, those with the most potential to suffer from the long term damaging effects of it.
I hate politics. I don't usually have really strong feelings about "party" associations. I do lean to the left on most social issues. But, in general, I also agree with Mark Twain that most politicians are idiots, regardless of party affiliation.
Not sure if social media or things like reality shows have anything to do with it; but it seems that a large percentage of the population really enjoys being in other people's pockets, all the time. They also seem to think that constant wise cracks and meanspirtedness is funny. It isn't. To para phrase Ellen Degeneres "if you are just kidding how come both of us aren't laughing" Also think it has to do with my being sick and that I'm not on my game anymore. It's easier for people to get me because my defenses are weak.
My work space was an absolute mess, but this was seriously the most fun I've had creating in some time. My beautiful friend Tanya said to me the other day..."you should do what you're passionate about..it always shows in your work when you love it" and she is so right.
That says: “You shouldn’t scat
Exercise is important for circulation too. In fact, it is equally important for long-term good health, because if you let your circulation and the condition of your blood deteriorate too much, there is a chance that your legs will not get enough energy to carry you around and then toes and feet begin to suffer.
We need a short enabling Act of Parliament to put the above principle into law, then any undesirable we want rid of should just be told: you have seven days to leave the country, after which, if you're still here, we will forcibly put you on a plane and send you to any other country that will take you - including delivering you to your worst enemy if that's most expedient for us. We should not even give a reason. If someone doesn't know why we find them undesirable it's not our job to educate them.
This image was taken without the zoom function:
On the subject of health and safety, I have deliberately not opined on whether it’s appropriate for women to perform in the nude. The naturists believe it tones the skin and allows the pores to breathe, but they are not an impartial source. All I will say is that I wouldn’t let them do it in jungle. Not without first rubbing them from head to toe with insect-repellent, anyway.
Someone stop this fricken roller coaster and let me off before my head explodes.
The investigation began in August 2010 after a botched procedure at Brigham’s Elkton clinic. An 18-year-old woman who was 21 weeks pregnant had her uterus ruptured and her bowel injured, and rather than call 911, Brigham and Riley drove her to a nearby hospital, where both were uncooperative and Brigham refused to give his name, authorities said.
41) Even if you were a cactus, i would still want to hug you! +
It is the rare e-mail that leaves me speechless. Here, at a reputable institution training future rabbis who will shape a generation of American Jews and their attitudes to Israel, the parties were treated with equal weight and honor in the run-up to Yom Ha-Zikaron. What the students were essentially being asked was whether the losses on Israel’s side touched them any more deeply than the losses on the side of Israel’s enemies.
Regardless of this kid’s harmlessness, he still invaded my home and went through my things. All of which is nerve-wracking for any person. You feel so out of control and debilitated because there is nothing you can do. What is done is done and what is gone is gone. For someone who is co-dependent and depends on controlling certain aspects of their own life (even though there has been lots of therapy to learn to let go of some things, there are still things that drive me crazy when out of my control), this has been a very traumatic event no matter how minimal the damage.
Finally the weekend........so much to do ,but at least i don't need to be up at 6:30 AM !!
-possess good looks minus a high EQ probably
i reawi wish that his cute sides would be broadcasted more to everyone, because it’s just impossible to resist him. And his smile warms my weary soul, truly!
You can freeze this soup in air tight containers for several weeks – perfect for entertaining and planning ahead.
Can't I spend just one more quarter at the bubblegum machine?
Set a few hundred years in the future, mankind has spread out from Earth into the far reaches of the solar system. Earth is still the cradle of humanity, but Mars has been entirely terraformed and populated, as have outer colonies been set up in the Asteroid Belt, known simply as The Belt. There is growing tension between the inner planets and The Belt due to heavy taxation of the colonies by Earth, and Mars and Earth are uneasy neighbors at best.
What is Channel 4's motive, what is the sub-text of this patently misleading little series of programmes?
I’m all about moving forward, not looking back. It wouldn’t be the same without Wash and Book, and just the thought of it makes me horribly depressed, but I don’t think you could go back in time without making it weird.
Dust . . . American . . . Dust
(Will it be on the privates perhaps?)
Kate: Medieval dystopian? I love that!! I'm a huge fan of mixing up genres in interesting ways.
We didn't actually need to do too much to the room itself, but we did (when I say 'we' I actually mean my DH Jonathan!) put a small kitchen in a store cupboard and totally transformed our toilet, which used to have big holes in the walls! And built this splendid work table.
Ian Truman
I’d love to hear from you if I’ve changed how you think about Down syndrome.
No one knew just what to do
touched my soul
There are also problems with these deals out with the contractual agreements. Many local families and farmers affected by the land-grabs feel that they have not been given the work nor the cheap produce that they were promised. Many have in fact found that they are now struggling more than they had previously been as the little they did have to sell or eat has been taken away from them.
To stall the airflow, you need a slot blowing at near right angles to the surface. This creates a narrow slot when viewed externally.
Contestant: I’m sorry; I don’t know the names of any countries in Spain.
Another preorder began, this time for album-inspired fragrances from Black Phoenix Alchemy Lab. You can take a guess at how backed up and screwed that became. Fool me once… Needless to say, I didn’t bother, and am glad for it.
Tere naam se marr jaaun
I’m sending out a debut, which is very exciting. The third revision came in on the weekend, and is ready to roll. So I did my pitch and my submission list last night and just got it out moments ago. Emails are popping up from excited publishers, saying they love the sound of it. I have a good feeling.
April 2012: You+Me+Bones marathon+Pancake House. I can’t freaking wait.
The Award for Vision presented by the Urban Land Institute is an honor and holds testament to the quality of the Seizing Our Destiny campaign and the lasting impact it will continue to have on the community. Seizing Our Destiny is a reflection of the strives made by the City of Arts & Innovation to provide the highest quality of life for its residents.
After spending all that time sorting through fabrics and determining where they sit on the colour wheel, my head is spinning and I'm beat. Whew! Who knew how tiring all this thinking would be.
fat, mom!" I was too sweaty to give them a hug,
1) Communication impairment
Neil Baldwin, a widely-published cultural historian and critic, is a Professor in the Department of Theatre & Dance, and Director of the Creative Research Center http://www.montclair.edu/creativeresearch in the College of the Arts. Prior to joining the faculty of Montclair State University, he was the Founding Executive Director of The National Book Foundation, sponsor of The National Book Awards. His teaching interests cover the span from dramaturgy and danceaturgy at the undergraduate level to arts management at the graduate level. His current areas of research include interdisciplinarity, the history of the imagination, Web-based modern dance documentation and archival practice, and the pedagogical centrality of the arts in American liberal education. Dr. Baldwin also serves as co-chair of the NYU Biography Seminar. His Web site is http://www.neilbaldwinbooks.com.
Well, do I feel fortunate. Susan, of The Wimpy Vegetarian (thewimpyvegetarian.com) this afternoon gifted me with a Liebster Blog Award. Liebster is German for “dear” or “darling,” and nothing could touch me more. It is designated for blogs with 200 followers or fewer. Out of gratitude to Susan, I have some darlings of my own to whom I would love to pass along the esteem. Along with Susan’s, each has become extremely dear to me for reasons of wisdom, kindness, generosity, and sheer love of sharing love via food:
"Did it work for you?”
By rocks our hands and feet are cut
(Yet a mournful wail and low sob I fancied I heard through the dark,
After the Red Flag, the galloping bull.
I picked up this adorable metal green picnic basket not long ago. I went nuts for the wood handles combined with the green metal. I've never been a fan of the all metal variety but this one, with the lovely wood handles, was calling my name. Love it!
I’ll attend book launches, writers conference – there’s more but I’m exhausting myself just writing this let alone doing it!
In addition, when search the term with ‘Fashion PR’, ‘Fashion Public Relations’, ‘Fashion PR Jobs’, ‘Fashion PR Agency’ and ‘Fashion PR Firm’ on Google, the company Website comes up at the top of the list, which indicates the company uses correct word for search engine optimization (SEO).
Should make it easy for you to see
It's super Cute...super Easy... and much cheaper than real Washi Tape! :)
Reuters AlertNet
Christopher Edward Allingham, 36, River Edge, N.J.
'Nana (Banana)
Isn’t that what we do? Try and adjust to issues and circumstances without complete understanding? I did.
What a wonderful way to spend a BEAUTIFUL Saturday in October. We all loved it! Yelp did not let us down! The only thing better than an afternoon at the pumpkin patch is an afternoon in the sunshine! To get both was just amazing!
My freezer: It may be small, but I have a ton of food stuff in there. A few dozen muffins, a couple of soups, veggie stock, quinoa and even some blackberries from the farmers market! I'm so happy that I have a spacious freezer in which to put these things that patiently lie in wait for me to consume them.
Scenes are not necessarily complete with beginning, middle, and end. They might leave us hanging, which tells us there will be another scene later to finish the story. We'll read on to find out where the thread continues.
Heaping tsp curry powder
Wang S, Chen H, Wang X. Studies on relationship between exposure to low concentration of mixed benzene and lower quality of semen and very early fetal loss (Chinese) Zhonghua Yu Fang Yi Xue Za Zhi 2000; 34:271-273.
His hair was perfect.
GTOH – Full lock out overhead, don’t catch the bar off the bounce.
What I'm trying to do here is to get you to relax,
This shirt/skirt combo will be perfect for when spring & summer role around too.
To say that Lil B is prolific is to severely understate the sheer quantity of material pouring forth from the young rapper, an Internet phenomenon who makes so much music that even a 600-song compilation of his work wasn't exhaustive. He's made more music in 2011 than most artists make in their entire careers, and that's true even if you just count his "official" mixtapes. He's also a rapper who loves provocation, as evidenced by the title of this particular mixtape — he's not, in fact, gay — and the parenthetical that seems like both a reflexive defensive maneuver and a way of underlining the ha-ha-only-kidding nature of the title. And then, the actual music is something else altogether, finding Lil B (a rapper of many styles and preoccupations) in his diaristic introspection mode, delivering naïve ruminations over soulful, low-key beats. With his patient, halting, occasionally off-kilter delivery, Lil B raps about race, self-image, religion, and mortality, his relaxed vocal style giving the impression that he's forming his thoughts in real time. It's an optimistic album, but not without a sense of darkness: he mentions suicide, slavery, racial profiling, and other societal evils, only to emphasize that personal struggle and positivity can help individuals get past these obstacles. That thematic focus is most apparent on album highlight "I Hate Myself," which lays its emotional stakes bare by underpinning Lil B's raps with a swooning Goo Goo Dolls sample. The lyrics on this track have a clever structure, enumerating all the ways in which society teaches black people to hate themselves, before flipping the song's meaning around with a coda in which Lil B declares, "everything that I've seen was a lie/ I'm not ready to die/ I love myself." [buy]
Miller, both sides of a rare promotional EP issued by Capitol in 1966 to help publicise Mrs Miller’s Greatest Hits. Record companies often issued open-ended interviews; these were banded discs which just contained the answers to questions by the artist involved. The disc would be sent out with a cue sheet full of questions and with timings for musical interludes, allowing the local
On Saturday we started out the day touring the Lower 9th Ward and St. Bernard Parish discussing local levee systems, educational systems, environmental systems, economic systems, juvenile (in)justice systems, and more. For lunch we made a stop at the Sankofa Farmer's Market and had some great conversation with some of our neighbors including Mr. Ronald Lewis of the House of Dance and Feathers, a neighborhood museum dedicated to the culture of Mardi Gras Indians, social and pleasure clubs, and musicians of the neighborhood before Hurricane Katrina.
His script begins after the Zombie Uprising has been quelled by the Human Volunteer Force and life is starting to return to normal. Any surviving zombies have been captured, medicated, held in an NHS holding facility in Norfolk and are being slowly re-integrated back into society, with the help of contact lenses and cover up mousse. The story follows teenager Kieran Walker and boldly goes where no zombie drama has gone before.
Janette: It seemed like you and Pris had something brewing, anything you can tell us about that?
But a security analyst said the latest move was “tantamount to encouraging the militants to have a real go at the convoys”.
A couple of days ago, I was specifically asked on one of the more general homeschooling lists, what we did for unschooling. Not an uncommon question at all, I am used to that and answer by sharing what the boys and I are "into" these days. Well another mom, not the one asking the question, chimed in with a LONG e mail. She was replying to my e mail so mine showed up underneath her response. This woman said how she has a schedule and courses for her daughter because she did not want to limit her daughters options later in life with her parental choices now, or non choices. Yes she used that word (non choices). Of course implying that our unschooling is completely thoughtless. She went on to say that her daughter wants to go to college and yes SHE knows unschoolers go to college, but her daughter wants to go to a prestigious college. Again implying that unschoolers or more to the point, my boys, will never go to any sort of "real" college. Her e mail went on and on, and no she did not use my name. And I don't even know her other than this post. But, since I was the only unschooler asked and the only unschooler to respond and she was replying to my e mail, it was obvious who she was responding to.
The future of liberal democracy, as well as of a vital bar and bench among us, may depend upon our ability to make proper use of the great resources of the Western tradition, especially as that tradition is developed in the greatest books available to us. Deeply rooted in that tradition is a standard which, on the one hand, raises our ethical and political aspirations as high as they can reasonably go and, on the other hand, makes it clear how limited may be the possibilities for living up to those aspirations.
I used some scrape pieces of fabric to tie around the stems.
I wonder about my childhood. Maybe my mother was a sea turtle. Perhaps I hatched in a sandy hole on a lonely beach, found my way to the sea alone. I certainly don’t recall being coddled, cajoled, and guided forth in any way. I remember rules, expectations, and dare I say it, spankings. I remember wanting to please my parents because the alternative was displeasing them which led to unpleasant consequences (see spankings above). Not my children. I do believe they wake up every morning conjuring new ways to challenge their parents. Although they are intelligent and articulate, my kids have very little life experience and often have no idea what they’re talking about. Don’t try to tell them that – they know everything.
Till death do us part, in my book there is no such line.
most gems are dancing, adorning human skin.
Each and every thing or action can either have baraka or not. For example, food that is purchased on an honest income, prepared with love and prayers, shared among as many people as possible is said to have baraka. Food that is bought with questionable money, or processed in an unnatural way, or consumed greedily without praise of the Creator, without sharing with or offering to those around us, is said to be devoid of baraka. The first kind of food makes you healthy, physically and spiritually, will never make you ill, will strengthen your body for doing good things, will strengthen bonds of friendship and unite hearts. The second kind will weaken you, make you anxious and leave you wanting.
I stood there like this: O__O
In the end, the ultimate objective is to get to universal health care, not any particular legislative outcome. Hence, despite whatever initial feelings of frustration we might feel in the moment, we have to keep our eye not just on the present but ten or twenty years from now.
Patrick Bateman: Hey Paul!
Exploring this recently developed, and potentially significant involvement of mtDNA’s role, in oral health, has led me to pertinent research, in which scientists have discovered in recent years that alterations in mitochondrial DNA occur in several types of tumors linked to smoking, including head and neck cancer. Building on this earlier work, a team of NIDCR grantees and colleagues hypothesized that people with oral squamous cell carcinoma may have elevated levels of mitochondrial DNA in their saliva, and this elevation would be independent of other possible contributing factors, such as age and how often one smokes (NIDCR, 2007).
Don’t hold your breath waiting for a patch that will protect you from the issues we’ll discuss below. It isn’t possible for Microsoft—or any software vendor—to “fix” them, because they result from the way computers work. But don’t abandon all hope yet—sound judgment is the key to protecting yourself against these issues, and if you keep them in mind, you can significantly improve the security of your systems.
worlds… The fire is lit, the ritual is begun.
The "big" kids are fond of sleeping beneath "the shroud".
Legaleaglemhm’s Blog Does what it says on the tin…. “Recording history as it happens – A paradigm shift in communications a new world of Law – help me to document it.”
I was tempted to go back in again once when had disappeared, but was persuaded by my wife that this might be a bit provocative. So we walk round the exterior of the church and get a good view of its structure. It is so small and homely: in a strange way I almost understand the village lady’s protectiveness towards it against the visitors.
For the hop today, I've created a Turkey Treat Card
4. Do whatever you can to increase women’s literacy because it’s the most effective lever on population growth, and it works without regard to culture or belief systems.
Place the mat on piece of coordinating felt and cut around it.
Not bad eh?!
Notice that I left white between the buds on the blossom. This is because I will be filling in that background area with a more grayed purple base so it doesn't compete with the buds which will get full lighting and are more important.
I’ve never come across a leper. After spending a lot of time amongst the homeless (the free lunches they get sure are tasty. If you simply piss in your own pockets and tousle your hair and they’ll accept you as one of their own), I’ve never seen an actual, real life leper.
Mark Francis Broderick, 42, Old Bridge, N.J.
Second batch of homebrew is almost ready for second fermentation, so fingers crossed. Bubbling is mostly stopped, gravity truth to be unveiled tonight. The Cream Ale involved way less STUFF, so maybe it's more idiot-proof? We shall see.
Row 20: Purl
Listen to what he has to say.
All of Princess Margriet's four daughters-in-law borrowed the Ears of Wheat Tiara on their wedding days, as did Princess Irene's daughter, Princess Margarita. The tiara, which can be worn with varying numbers of wheat ears, is very subtle; so much so that you can hardly see it on some of these brides. It's a piece that makes sense for these ladies, as they are all a step removed from the main line of the royal family (Margriet and Irene are sisters of Queen Beatrix). Queen Beatrix's three daughters-in-law, on the other hand, borrowed more substantial pieces.
DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES
Attempts to find a time to meet in order to finalize the plans were thwarted by the syndic's lack of availability in December.
“Do-do, do-do-do-do-do-DO, subscribe!”
Dick's recordings got me going back to Logue's poems - I've had a copy of his Ode to the Dodo sitting on the shelves for years. I won't write about it at length, only to say that he speaks with a bold, musical, refreshing authority. I'll just quote this, from New Numbers (1969):
So, that's the saddest part of the story. ): . I look so hideous that I don't wanna go out until I get my hair done, and during that day, I'm having rashes, I took so much courage to step out of my house to see doctor!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Hahhahaha.
The series finale in May of 1998 was one of the most-watched shows in TV History. It is also one of the most debated episodes the show ever had. Many fans hated the finale (me among them..) while others loved it.
Madison is instantly drawn to the handsome and intriguing Isaac Addington. She quickly realizes he’s a guy harboring a secret, but she’s willing to risk the unknown to be with him.
Scarce o Tatties
by Kyoko Kuriki
Teaser sentences (from page 20): ‘It’s one of my better entrances. Dad lowers the paper and Mom drops the potato she’s peeling over the sink and they look at me like I’m certifiable, but I’d rather be certifiable than perpetually boring, which is my parents in a nutshell.’
I used only white cardstock and used two different embossing folders. Then I used a white ribbon (Home Sweet Home), a silver snowflake and more bling for the snow. I like how all the colors look on the white background.
Is it any wonder that the Ukrainian populous have so little faith in their political classes?
SFT
b. Most contain the same active ingredients as other national brands.
We explored the Lafayette Cemetery located in the Garden District of New Orleans. Since the city is below sea level, settlers needed to find different methods to burying their deceased because one good rainfall would cause caskets to push out of the ground. New Orleans adopted the Spanish-style wall vaults, and now 90% of the city’s burials are above ground.
Though Pulau Dayang Bunting is easily approachable by motorboats available on rent at the Kuah Jetty, the trek up to the Gua Langsir is an arduous task and calls for considerable skill. The natives of Langkawi, however, desist from entering the cave precincts as the “Langsir” (evil specter) haunting the cave is believed to lure human victims into the cave and drink up their blood. Tourists however are known to enjoy their time in exploration of this enigmatic cave.
So what happened to Chamakh to cause such a loss in form? Yes, his decline did coincide with FIFA’s ban on the snood (a fashion item that Chamakh was never seen without) and it did echo his fellow North African Amr Zaki’s debut Premier League season, where he was excellent until Christmas before completely collapsing.
But even if your interest is in astronomy only to learn the names of the stars in the sky,
On the day of the third visit we are nervous: if we don’t get an extension today, we will have to get a tow to Turkey right away. Trouble is, we don’t know whether we will be permitted to enter Turkey. The last time we had to cross the Turkish border with a broken engine (yes, incredibly, there was a time, about a million years ago last summer), it was insisted upon that the vehicle was driven over the border. That time it was just about possible; this time – no chance.
That is it some homemade misting basics.
A few years back my brokerage was audited by the regulatory bureaucrats, which is a standard bi-annual occurrence. These people just about had KITTENS over a six dollar interest credit which I had booked, but it was placed in a current account, and the regulators wanted it in a non-current account. Just to repeat, it was SIX DOLLARS. As in a fiver and a single. As in a modest lunch at a drive-thru fast food chain. SIX DOLLARS. This six dollars drug my audit out for WEEKS and cost me I-don't-know-how-much in CPA billing hours. And these people acted like I was some sort of criminal.
Many people interpret the Beatitudes as a theological proposition. View from that perspective, this text might suggest that we must make ourselves “poor in spirit,” “meek,” “hungry and thirsty,” etc. in order to receive God’s blessing. Another interpretation proposes that these qualities are unattainable, and that Jesus is talking about an ideal spiritual state which we must only strive for. But if a sermon is a call to action, and not a theological treatise, then these interpretations cannot do the sermon justice.
salt & pepper to taste
The house features two large rooms fronted with glass and separated by a wading pool, pergola and small deck. The walls, floors, deck and accent walls are all texture change and there are a ton of options. I’ll be doing more photos of this great build in the next few days so stay tuned.
The point is, I know these guys don’t think or believe like I do on some subjects. They are going to act and talk differently because they are different. I don’t think any less of them. I follow my beliefs and do things like pray for them, try to engage them in deeper personal conversation, find out about their families, their kids, girlfriend(s), what they are passionate about, etc… It helps me see them as human and not some beastly creature that is there to make my world a living nightmare.
Washers seems to be a pretty "Texan" thing. I don't know anyone outside the state who has heard of it, but essentially it is played everywhere in some form just with a different name. You pretty much have two holes across from each other and washer rings that you throw at the holes...whoever get's their ring closer or in the hole gets some amount of points. You can read more here. Yep, washers has it's very own nonprofit site. This may all sound silly to some of you, but believe me this can keep a group busy for HOURS! We will be posting about making our very own washer boards (since we can't dig holes in the parent's backyard at the wedding - yeah that's right we are having washers at the wedding) soon.
That leaves three slots for guest beers.
All these bags were shuttled back to Hayward where they awaited the skiers return in organized "ques" guarded zealously by several volunteers.
You want the fame, you want the power, you just want to be understood, heard, appreciated, and adored.
I’m calling on believers to return to their Biblical roots and to turn from a secularized worldview that separates Bible and Government. Biblical morality or lack of it has never been absent in the political arena. We carry our morality and ethics into our legislative decision making. To think there is a separation of Bible and Government and to vote for elected officials on qualifications alone and to ignore their spiritual life is to embrace a naive and foolish worldview. The Bible warns us against such men saying there will be those who say they know God, but in fact they do not now God. Sounds like the rhetoric of a skilled politician doesn’t it? Therefore, if we want to make a change in the laws we must make a change in the law makers and support truly Born Again believers into office and initiate evangelistic efforts to win unbelieving law makers to Christ.
The bubbles rose and burst around;
Alex: “I suppose it’s cheaper than Rohypnol.”
well...my 28 days came and went...nothing was happening...this is a critical time...I was thinking that all of them had died...and just as I was about to throw out these eggs...thinking it was a total failure...my Honey begged for two more days... til Thursday Baby Doll...just wait til Thursday!...and then.this happened today...
What's for dinner:
Along the way, West and Gordon are joined by Rita Escobar, who was being held prisoner by Loveless. Rita says she was looking for her kidnapped father, but it is a lie solely to create a sexual competition between West and Gordon. We do not find out until later the missing scientist is her husband. But in the interim, we get an eyeful of her Botticelli buttocks, as they are called, so I suppose that is consolation for the unfunny rivalry between the two competing for her affection.
@Flexfokus1
I’m inspired by that student in my classroom, the one who always struggles with math, but perseveres despite that. The one who, when I say, “You guys ready to go over this problem,” shouts, “NO!” And begs for one more minute so she can finish it herself.
Benz loves being included in everything. If we are playing just across the room he will whine or start rolling to get where we are. He doesn't like being left alone at all. And, he loves faces. If only I could just sit right in front of him all day he would be the happiest little guy alive. His favorite person to watch is still Owen and I am convinced he is just soaking in all the things Owen does for a later date, that might not be as much later as we'd like.
Ted looks confused and I smirk. Ha that finally got through to him.
Also present at the press conference were Edward Luak, chairman of Serian DAP branch and about 30 landowners.
I was at home recently and after a conversation with my wife decided to make some Honeycomb, or cinder toffee as she calls it. I'd never made it before and as an Irish person that closest you're going to get to this is a Crunchie bar unless you had someone to make it for you as a kid.
He died with grace and dignity, a feat that I was lucky to have witnessed. In full acceptance of his fate, not knowing the minute or the hour that it would transpire, he was in loving care and completely lucid of his retirement. No longer in fear, but only in complete arms of faith. I can only hope to meet death with the same solid heart and sound mind as he.
One region in eastern Quebec, however, has always been solidly French Canadian and yet has low incidences of Tay Sach’s and mucoliposes. This is Beauce County, a region south of Quebec City that covers the Chaudière valley up to the American border. Furthermore, Beaucerons are stereotyped as being self-reliant, business-minded go-getters—the “Yankees” of Quebec.
“…it wasn’t ever something I was supposed to be able to explain to begin with.” If you can’t explain it, or even understand it, then why are you arguing with me? Why are you even studying scripture? Or are you actively not studying scripture so that you can remain ignorant of the book you claim to believe in, because you know that you can’t understand or explain it? I don’t know, your explanation doesn’t make much sense, or did you intend for it to not make sense like Jesus did?
As I continue my chronological journey of the works of H.P. Lovecraft, I have come across a number of what I call "minor works"--those which are either too short to merit a full review, or those on which I have very little to say for whatever reason. Here are six more that fit into this category.
Here are all the new acceptances, in no particular order, some of which you will recognise from recent blog posts.
I had no idea at the time I'd wear the purple jacket three times during the month of May, starting with the New Jersey Hall of Fame, then to the Authors Guild gala, and finally, to the White House. Yes, that White House. Had no idea why we were invited to this reception. The invitation said something about celebrating Jewish American Heritage Month. Who even knew there was a Jewish American Heritage month?
The buzz around the blog world is Celebrity Dopplegangers. I love this topic because over the years I have gotten so many different celebrities. I also get a lot of people who tell me I look "just like so and so". I have a very familiar face I guess.
Bottom line: its intrusive and far from what I require as an online experience.
With hinged knees and steady hand to dress wounds,
You can put a lead bullet clean through this guitar
Any who, this summer, I plan to work hard, but play hard :). I want to enjoy this summer, by doing lots of things, to doing, nothing on some days,to doing random things, to trying new things and of course enjoying the nice weather (hopefully - depending on how mother nature wants to treat us).
Sunday: 6 miles easy at 9:00 pace
The Registrar of Societies threatened to shut down Sahabat Alam Malaysia for “acting extremely”.
Although I wish I could be out in the world exploring, partaking in wondrous adventures, and traveling around the world, sitting here in my room with my laptop is good, too. Maybe not as exciting, but just as nice and, to be honest, a heck of a lot safer.
Anyone can roast beef!
It looks like I have been affected by your adoption of Henry.
All I want to do is send off everything that I’ve been writing and get on with my day but I’m being assaulted by a five bar(red) gate that will only offer the privilege of opening up if I shove plastic cash at it. The mail I want to send will take milliseconds to fire off; equals this is nothing other than daylight robbery. Using the analogy of what is now termed as snail-mail, this’d be the equivalent of any government run institution charging three or more dollars / pounds / euros to send a single letter.
Hitler was just tapping into a persistent Xenophobia, not making up something new.
I sat there with my eyes closed unable to contain the sorrow and the guilt. As the day light began to dance on the shimmering water and voices of the village folks began to rise above the silence I gathered some buds and half-opened flowers and made my way to the little pagan temple of the goddess of love, near the village.
A stuffed and mounted deer wearing a baseball cap is the first sight that greets you on the stairs. Grandma is also a fan of toffee apples, judging by the stash on the staircase - we could have guessed she'd have a sweet tooth.
Sunday: Rest Day
3/19/2012 South Lake Tahoe, CA – Mo’s Place
· They believe in complete unity and believe that there is nothing they can not accomplish through this unity.
Equity Balance @ 10/31/2010: (not recorded).
the general ‘fucked-up’ hangover.
Finding an unlisted number in Romania in the middle of the night was, I admit, a trifle tricky but, find it I did. The Ambassador – whose name was Ivor and who was possessed of the most sing-song Welsh valleys voice I’ve ever heard – was unflappable charm and courtesy itself. Five hours after the first call had been made, a few strings had been pulled and the fiddler had been released.
Jackie: I don’t feel like many people even attempt to compare us to a single band. But we have seen some pretty impressive mash-up combos that could perhaps give a reader who has never heard us a sense of what we might sound like. We have been compared to any number of these bands mixed up with each other: Opeth, Tool, Scorpions, Indukti, Godspeed You Black Emperor, Pelican, The Fucking Champs, King Crimson, Ved Buens Ede, Dysrythmia, Slint, The Canterbury Sound, Silent Stream of Godless Elegy, Anekdoten, Isis, Mastodon, Beggar's Opera. My favorite comparison though is this one: “Apocolyptica, Neurosis, and Metallica capped off with a Nyquil fueled lullaby…”
Or can you?
Challenge #90 Winner
Vastly different was the Gussie who stood before me now. Self-confidence seemed to ooze from the fellow’s every pore. His face was flushed, there was a jovial light in his eyes, the lips were parted in a swashbuckling smile. And when with a genial hand he sloshed me on the back before I could sidestep, it was as if I had been kicked by a mule.
Now, give us (your readers) time to know your character and become interested in her, and then we will care. But, starting right out of the gate with a character waxing rhapsodic is like having some stranger in the checkout line start telling you about her nasty divorce. It’s just weird.
Fred Lynn, Red Sox: 1976 Topps (with the rookie cup!)
Muhyiddin said PKR leaders should respect Article 153 of the Federal Constitution which provides a safeguard for the special position of the Malays and Bumiputera as well as the interests of other communities.
I feel a knot at the back of my neck. Water that plays at, around, and in my eyes.
Typewriter Page. It’s simply a case of snowballing: it’s been acquiring accretions for 17 years now, so it has become fairly impressive. But the truth is that I often still feel like a newbie when I consult the encyclopedic books about typewriters or talk to collectors who’ve done tons of primary historical research, understand mechanical engineering far better than I can, or have a
cardigan Wet Seal
Replacing an outlet cover is a two screw job at most. The Duncan electrician does not only change the outlet cover for artistic or visual reason; outlet covers are changed for the safety of small children by installing a sliding cover that obstructs those dangerous holes when they’re not in use.
So if you know people like this, who don’t phone you, or take your calls, we’re not avoiding you – well OK, we are, but it’s not personal – we’re just trying to cope with shit that the able-bodied can barely begin to imagine, in the best way we can.
Then social places. I can lead. I can follow. I can sit. I can do. I can be the chameleon I sometimes need to be. That little voice tells me, Know your place. And I try to respond appropriately by following instinct.
I did work on a card. I made this one for the "ways to use it" challenge on Splitcoaststampers. Hannah was the hostess and she loves ruffles. So that was her challenge to us. Make a card with some ruffles on it.
He was given the job after the general election by David Cameron not because he has long political pedigree in the Conservative Party but for one reason only: he is Cameron’s closest friend.
ENTER TO WIN THIS GREAT BOOK
The dock is huge and cement, and is the best place to get a suntan.
At the moment, everyone is in a honeymoon period with the Kindle, Nook and their cohort. They can do no wrong (unless you believe they will 'kill the book'). Perhaps this is because most writers and agents (and even publishers) embraced technology very late in the day. How many of you have a manuscript on a five-and-a-quarter-inch floppy disk, written in WordStar or View? I have. That book is out of print. And, to be honest, it would be easier to scan it in, OCR it, and lay it out again than to work from the files. I'd have to dig around in my historic computer collection for all the bits and remember how to use them, and then find a way of getting the stuff off (no USB, no internet connection - we're talking things that were operated by a keen hamster in a wheel).
So here's my take on the praise issue.
Point being, I’m not entirely sure what made me move to the comment section of a recent article about Mel Gibson’s rants against a Jewish writer. The article outlined Gibson’s verbal barrages while vacationing with several families. The son of the writer recorded some of them, and they included him shouting about his ex-wife and calling her a “filthy _____ (name which I can’t bring myself to even type other than saying it is a reference to being sexually serviced, using a slang word for part of the male anatomy).” The rest of the verbal assaults were not recorded so I won’t comment on the racial hatred he supposedly spewed.
Indications are that Paul Kruger and Pretorius streets will retain their names. However, according to Ramokgopa, the whole section of Paul Kruger Street between the Pretoria railway station, passing through Church Square to the Pretoria Zoo, would be upgraded to demonstrate how the council intends to adapt, shape and improve the inner city to be more accommodating for non-motorised commuting. - (Source)
John with Paul Salmon
Humankind is always fixating on the Moon and Mars as the most likely spots for the first space colonies, but there is another crazy possibility. Aside from the Sun and the Moon, Venus is the brightest object in the night sky. Earth’s closest planetary neighbor, Venus is a veritable sister planet with extremely similar mass and volume. Because of its size and position in the solar system, a great deal of early science fiction concentrated around Venus. Dreamers and fabulists posited that beneath its ominously uniform cloud cover was a lush tropical rainforest filled with lizard people and pulchritudinous scantily clad women (the fact that the planet’s Greco-Roman name is synonymous with the goddess of love and beauty seems to have influenced many generations of male space enthusiasts).
Port Aransas, for the non-Texans amongst us, is a small town on Mustang Island, on the Gulf Coast about four hours away from Austin. The beach at Mustang Island (which is effectively on North Padre Island) is...well, it's nicer than some Texas beaches, like around the Houston/Galveston area. It's not as pretty as South Padre, which has more of that white sand-palm tree beach look about it; however, it has the big advantage (when one has children in the car) of being two hours closer to Austin, and also of being generally cheaper and not as touristy.
Intro music is Barracuda by Heart.
STO: What is a Grayceon live show like for the band and for the audience? What sort of people do you see at your shows? With a few songs over ten minutes long, how do you pick your live set?
Story Blurb: Abandoned by her family, Lacey is sent to a juvenile detention center known as Clear Waters. Her teen years don’t look promising until she is befriended by a mysterious stranger named Taylor, a gorgeous guy whose captivating eyes seem to stare into her soul. Convinced she is in danger at Clear Waters, Lacey joins Taylor in a daring escape. As she meets Taylor’s group of friends, she discovers that they’re more than they seem – they’ve been sent from the future to head off an evil corporate plot that will lead to a world war unless averted. With Lacey as their only hope to prevent a grim future, Taylor shows Lacey how to tap into her psychic abilities known in his time as evolved humans. Travelling with her new friends, she discovers the magic of love while she grows into the powerful warrior chosen to make the difference to the world!
We enter the Reichstag to arm ourselves with democracy’s weapons. If democracy is foolish enough to give us free railway passes and salaries, that is its problem. It does not concern us. Any way of bringing about the revolution is fine by us.
Much has taken place that set up the perfect storm of today. From Woodrow Wilson to Nixon, Bush, Clinton and Obama, from the establishment of the Federal Reserve to the repealing of the Glass-Steagall Act, the environment that exists today was made for the looting of America.
The course started with James Clay from University of Gloucester who talked about the challenges and issues libraries facing from embedding the use of e-books. Anna Hooper form Bristol libraries gave the public library consortium approach to the e-book service and how well is being used.
Now, I’m not really an idiot, although it sounds like it. And, OK, I feel like one. I’m wondering if I should just let it go. I have the urge to resubmit, because I made a mistake, and oh well, that happens. I do want to put my best foot forward, however, and I think I have a really good book. I also don’t want the people I sent the book to, to waste their time trying to figure out ‘what the heck?’ Right? Then, again, I wonder, geesh…is sending it again another dumb move?
I am back to update my blog journal.
The classes start at 10:10 in the morning, and while it means I have to get up and out of the house way earlier than normal, I love it. I think it's something every teacher should do, at least a few times. Most of the time, we English teachers have a good life here in the ROK and it treats us pretty well. It's only fair to give something back above and beyond what our jobs call for.
The appliance had been stripped down so the drum was exposed.
“If that is an issue, I would have thought it is something which the Workers’ Party would have considered before deciding to expel Mr Yaw Shin Leong… So if we are in this situation today, it is because the Workers’ Party has caused this situation to happen knowing the consequences.”
Peter O’Donnell, Jr.
Sooooo.... that is ONE thing that has been holding my interest lately -- oh yes - it's going to have my stationary bike in there too... and also a CRIB, and perhaps something for Luz to sleep on too! Trying to decide what ... day bed? Futon? I'm going to have to see how much room is left once the bike and the crib get in there! This is SUPPOSED to be my workout room! And speaking of working out...
where before
After these and a tiff between the girlfriend and the boyfriend about whether or not they were going out, we went out (without the boyfriend) to a local bar. I had actually never been to a bar in Houston or the surrounding areas, so I was down for whatever. The bar was hoppin', if you will, but not too packed. It was being patronized mostly by hicks and trashy people (we were in Rosenberg, Texas after all), but they had Ziegenbach, and one of my goals had been to have some before leaving Texas for Florida, so I was happy. I got a glass, and then everyone wanted some, so we got a pitcher. I didn't realize I wouldn't be able to find a picture of the stuff on the internet, or else I would've tried harder to get a better picture of the stuff.
I know that those on the left of the party relish in the dogma of the 1980s. That’s why they are so keen to label Cameron a Thatcherite (he’s not) and to attack anyone who mentions helping business or free enterprise.
Jerry is my hero.
If Helmut seems overly proud of his wardrobe, that's because he is. And why wouldn't he be? I mean, have you seen what he's got in there? A veritable fascist wonderland full of capes, garish medals, leather trousers, jackboots, skintight numbers that defy description, and lots of furs, Helmut Wallenberg has to be the most fashion conscious Nazi the Third Reich has ever seen (he must get his uniforms custom made). Don't tell anyone this, but I nearly fainted when I saw that the swastika armband attached to his black and white trench-coat was covered in sparkles. I liked how he was able to change his outfit three times while still managing to focus his energy on Margherita's stunning vagina. Hey, say what you will about his prickly personality, the man loves fashion and pussy.
This is indeed prevalent in Manchester over the last 10 years of perpetual building of what looks like block after block of Apartments / offices that look like they from Russia and eastern Block countries
There's an ongoing cyclical process of continents drifting apart and coming back together into a supercontinent (why??). Folks hypothesize a 'new' pangaea happening in the future, whereby Asia rotates clockwise, pushing the UK into the polar cap and Siberia into the equator. Africa smashes into Europe, replacing the Meditarrean sea with a huge mountain range: see here and here.Yup, "Pangaea Ultima". It happens for the same reason that this cycle has always occured...unstable plates floating along magma convection flows.
At 16 1/2, an age he achieved on Jan. 4 (his birthday is July 4), he cannot see well--but he can still see. He cannot hear well--but he can still hear. He cannot walk well--but he can still walk. And lately it seems that he cannot smell well, either; to get him to eat you have to pick up a piece of food and hold it under his nose, and he will turn his head away three or four times, but you must keep following the nose and eventually, if you are lucky, he will suddenly notice that the thing you are holding has a smell, and the smell is good, and he will eat it, and then you pick up another piece of food and do it again.
These came out so well I'm almost pinching myself! Soft and pliable, and just lightly chewy - perfect for scooping up a Madras curry made with Gardein beef tonight, but also delicious on their own, with a really nice touch of saltiness from the sea salt. The cast-iron skillet also gave a good charred flavor, like they'd cooked over an open flame instead. Quite a triumph, particularly since I worried my dough was too sticky at a point or two during the recipe process.
No one can challenge Imran Khan for the spot of being Pakistan’s finest cricketer ever. He was the man who took cricket from a hobby to a craze in the country. Handsome, suave, outspoken and phenomenally talented, Imran was just the role model the Pakistani youth were looking for. As a bowler, it was him and Intikhab Alam who pioneered the reverse swing and took the world by storm in the 80s. His reverse swinging yorkers were the best thing to have happened to bowling since Larwood’s bouncers half a century ago. Just like wine, Imran got better with age. He averaged just 19 with the ball in his last 10 years in Test cricket.
From the Earth to a space station.
When you are ready, after at least 8 hours, lightly flour a work surface and place dough on it. Sprinkle the top with flour and knead it 15 times. This means folding it over on itself. Shape dough into a ball, cover with plastic wrap and let rise for 2 hours.
If you are not certain where you can get hold of Three Rivers Archery goods, go online. They have an excellent web site which is massive although still simple to navigate. If you are interested in archery, then I am in no doubt that you could easily spend an hour or more just browsing the web site.
3 cups shredded white cabbage
buy this doll, so that mommy could give it to my
9. The Arcadians - Here's Where Mary Loved To Be
National Tainan Living Art Center
In case any of this isn't completely obvious, the three killers are all profiting from the murders - with the restaurant owners serving up the murder victims, and the funeral owner making money burying the 'leftovers'.
The same sense of Confucian immediacy applies to exiting from a packed bus too. For the Confucian: ‘Shita! My stop’s coming up and half this lot have already shoved their way to the exit door. I’d better shove even harder to make sure I’m off first, otherwise it might never happen and disharmony will occur’. Logic, in contradistinction, approaches things differently: ‘Great! Everyone else is pressing up towards the back of the bus. If I just wait here then I can get off last without being crushed and having my kidneys poked by needle-fingered grandmothers’. Despite knowledge gained through observation and experience the Confucian will repeat the same uncomfortable alighting/exiting behaviour so as not to upset a wider harmony, not to stick out. For the logician this is … well, stupid.
And of course here is Selma's example card for the challenge, she always does AWESOME work, so hop on over and check our her card out HERE!!!
So if strange things are happening to you at work, it’s just part of your gang stalking. It’s not your imagination. What you think is happening, is.
For teen readers or just fans of Young Adult like myself you can also get the fantastic Department 19 by Will Hill and/or The Name of the Star by Maureen Johnson for just £1 each!
I was able to spend some time with my great friend R tonight getting facials. It was a gift from her and we have both been so busy that we weren't able to take advantage of it earlier, so we finally made it...my face feels fantastically smooth and soft. It was my first facial, but I am pretty sure I'll have another one again soon. It was nice.
An effective church—one that poses a real threat to the Enemy—is a body of discipled people who have been taught the truth of Scripture, trained for service, and helped to mature spiritually. But all this is accomplished for the purpose of going out into the world, not for becoming a self-contained sanctuary of Christian comfort. ~Charles Stanley
King Solomon: Women, what appears……
Speaking of digging. Digging into a soft, creamy, perfectly baked souffle is one of life's pure pleasures, but many home cooks won't attempt a souffle proclaiming them too complicated, too temperamental or just plain difficult. Not so I say! (have I steered you wrong yet?)
Here is the cover. The names on the front, is the names of my swap partners two boys.
Your time is valuable and if you want to get the best of each day you first need to master the art of choosing and then saying no to everything else.
Line 8: which amuses me to no end.
The dream pulls her barefooted along the sidewalk. She walks without weave or waiver, mirroring the straight line of row homes in our Baltimore neighborhood.
Unser TOP1 der letzten Challenge ist
He was also started on a second, more powerful antibiotic. His little body was being bombarded and I just hoped that we would see improvement soon.
This has to be the most useless list I have ever made. A list of household chores, no one even cast a glance over it and I still struggle to do everything myself.
out of it. On the contrary, for a fleeting instant,
I began by contacting my direct advisors and some friends that work in the labs at my school. All teachers have a professor or two that they could reach out to for help, and trust me, they are especially willing to assist you in bringing your students (essentially a college’s customers) to their campus to see the cool work they do on a daily basis.
So here's the start of my new blog.
Knowledge is horizontal, but wisdom is vertical – it comes down from above.
I took the washing line ribbon and machine stitched it to make a pleated trim, then I layered up various ribbons. I finished off by using one of the new Waltzingmouse Stamps Compact Sentiments, stamped in black to make it pop out.
The time to be grateful is now. Be happy for what you have right now. It is wonderful to set goals and await their fruition, but do you really take the time to appreciate those things when they arrive? Or do you quickly “blow them off” and say “that’s nice,but I’ll REALLY be happy when___”
I need to get out more.
"...but if circumstances should at any time oblige the government to form an army of any magnitude, that army can never be formidable to the liberties of the people, while there is a large body of citizens, little if at all inferior to them in discipline and use of arms, who stand ready to defend their rights..." - Alexander Hamilton, Federalist 29.
The time when I thought I could bake, when I was still lack of knowledge, resulting in disastrous time in the kitchen preparing this cake, and a far from acceptable cake, in terms of the taste, texture and presentation
Now, the truth is, we don’t know. But what’s fascinating is how we naturally think of wolves. What kinds of teaching do we think will tear a church apart?
In the first half of the 20th Century, classical film theory often wrestled with such questions as the nature of cinematic reality and perception, befitting the radically different nature of this new medium at the dawn of modernity. However, with the emergence of larger intellectual movements such as cultural studies, psychoanalytic theory, post-colonialism and so forth, theorists increasingly gravitated to issues of ideology and representation. Meanwhile, remarkable shifts in technological innovation and industrial strategies presented alternate media platforms which, by the end of the century, had gained as much cultural prominence as a film medium that was becoming increasingly digitized. This course serves as an advanced introduction into some of the major film and media theories developed since the 1970s. Significant attention will be paid to cinematic ideology and representation in relation to such issues as gender, race, authorship, postmodernism, genre, affect and cinephilia, as well as a sustained focus on developments in convergence and newer media (television, videogames and digital cinema). Since this is an advanced theory course, students will be expected to make a good faith effort to tackle complex ideas in class discussion and in assigned writings.
(India Mail 02.03.95).
Ferne’s Accident
Nowadays, LVMH has purchased this business so that it would shift beyond it was along with her view selections. This mix has given Hublot replica watches one thing for being special about. There's a mix of affluence and extravagance within these low cost timepieces. These include Europe timepieces containing built good name for per se and on the world that is loaded with timepieces and patterns. You will find called WISeKey wise unit card currently in use because of the enterprise in eliminating fakes today that is progress into their patterns. Hublot have provided us with timepieces that are cost-effective and amazing.
I subscribe to a few magazines. I mean the print versions. I know it’s very old fashioned of me, but I dig it. I like the feel of the magazine in my hands, and I like browsing through the pages, reading the adds and the small contents talking about this and that which is relevant to the magazine’s mission. I don’t think you can do that with online media, because when you are looking at a website there are so many links and images, slideshows, and flashing adds to name a few, you only want to focus on the written text. There’s no real incentive to rest your eyes and flick through the short snippets of detail about, as I said, this and that which is relevant to the magazine’s mission. Your eye doesn’t wander to a story by accident and then stay enthralled by the contents, because all too often there’s a link with an abstract which often isn’t enough to get your attention. Online magazines really take headline browsing to a newer and less informed level.
The World of Late Antiquity: AD 150-750 was published in 1972 and created new interest in this previously over-looked period of history. Edward Gibbon’s Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire, first published in 1776, established the view that Barbarians and Christianity were the two most important factors in bringing about a violent end to the greatness of Rome, followed by almost a millennium of the “Dark Ages”, before the ‘light of learning’ was rekindled in the Renaissance. This narrative has remained dominant among historians until fairly recently. Peter Brown was an instrumental force in bringing about an alternate view of this period he had newly christened ‘Late Antiquity’. His vision is not one of destruction and darkness, but of dynamic transformation. His works are based not around political and military events, but around ideas like ‘continuity’, ‘synthesis’, and ‘transformation’ in other, non-traditional themes. This has opened up a whole new world of scholarship, and his historiography focuses not so much on political and military events in the ‘Thucydidean’ manner, but also synthesizes cultural, social, economic, anthropological, and religious themes together in a more ‘Herodotean’ tradition (a dichotomy discussed by his mentor, Italian historian Arnaldo Momigliano).
So far we have been lucky, but I know it is only a matter of time...
There was Delores Park; where years ago we laid
As a final gift, Eden and HerShe held hands bowing to their fans. Plus a tender Jerry couple moment. Looks like someone’s heart fluttered..
Crushed walnut shells (found at your local pet store)
“The airline in turn would have to make a claim against the supplier of the food but for passengers, it’s the airline that is liable,” he was quoted as saying by AAP.
Disc1
Vladimir Lenin founded the publication “Vpered” (the Russian word for “forward”) in 1905. Soviet propaganda film-maker Dziga Vertov made a documentary whose title is sometimes translated as “Forward, Soviet” (though also and more literally as “Stride, Soviet”).
This time it was Wisley and it was brilliant - you can walk around all day and every 5 minutes something new heaves into view that the kids want to jump on - and, critically, there is a cafe hidden in every corner. It was a wonderful day out - bracing, educational, lovely flowers, butterflies... and here are the pictures of this civilised and inspiring venture:
Surveys on NBC.com are annoying
And they will of course pass!
The majority of Egyptians are Sunni Muslims, but in addition to Coptic Christians, there are other minorities such as Jews, Baha'is and Shia Muslims.
According to the government’s account, on the night of March 11, 2012 in the village of Balandi and Alkozai, twenty-two Afghan civilians were shot maliciously; 17 killed, five suffered fatal injuries. Among those killed, were children found burned. The Army alleges that Staff Sergeant Robert Bales was a lone miscreant in this heinous massacre, despite civilian eyewitnesses saying that there were accomplices. The U.S. government suggested that alcohol played a key role in the incident. Bales was then charged with 17 counts of murder, 6 counts of attempted murder, and 6 counts of assault.
Finally managed to sort through the pics from the forever 21 london launch! The party itself was amazingly entertaining and well organized, I have to give extra points for the 3D hologram fashion show! I had my uni deadline the morning after, which is my excuse for looking a bit tired in some of the photos..
Its hard to believe that he will be adopted before Mia
no matter how often I stumble,
How could so much of my flesh still be alive?"
The Community First Foundation started Colorado Gives Day in 2010. The Foundation helps donors support charitable causes through planned giving and Donor Advised Funds, and offer grants, fund management and education to nonprofits. They have been serving the community since 1975.
1 1/2 tbsp of olive oil
As I have said many times before, I love this CD ROM. It is amazing! I have never seen so many beautiful things in one place!!
Great Orme Country Park Visitor Centre-There is almost 350 million years of history here, which covers everything from local birdlife to the Orme’s many paths and trails.
And what a run it was!
She said yes.
* Copic Markers (colours listed below)
Place 1/2 a box of vanilla pudding in a small bowl. Add enough juice to make a syrup.
your blue eyes looking like holes.
Visualising them coming into reality .
Someone to loosen the spigot of night.
My personal motto became something along the lines of: "Throw it overboard."
Casa Olympe: Olympe is one of the most celebrated chefs in France, fresh breads, inseason truffles, cheeses from Corsica, crayfish...her dishes are an inspiration and a delight to the senses.
Huh, I guess that was just enough.
As you can imagine, I can hardly wait!
Car loans through home equity is one thing to consider. You can offer your home as collateral in exchange for a new or used car loan. You have a high interest rate with this loan type but the tax advantages might be worth the amount you pay.
My grandmother was 96 when she passed away. She was a quilter. My mother gave me one of my grandmother quilts. It had design on it that was very unique. I researched the pattern and found out the name of was called “The Monkey Wrench”. During slavery when slaves were going to escape that night, they places a quilt on the fence or outside that had a specific design on it . The design was a secret code for escaping. In the design the slaves knew what to do. The “Monkey Wrench” meant that slaves should take tools with them to escape on the underground railroad. The slaves knew from that design what was needed to get to freedom. The drawing above reflects the Northern Star design. It was a hidden map in the design of how to escape North.
The editor offered a contract within days. And she said nice things, calling it "stellar writing", and how much she loved the characters and the high adventure. You know. The stuff that makes an author feel all warm and fuzzy.
It has been ages since I have had time to post ... family time and work always seem to interfere with "my time" but isn't that just the way. While I wish for alone time now, I know that someday my house will be quiet with the memories of giggling kids and I will beg them to stay longer when they visit or talk more when the call. This I know because it is how my mother feels now. But enough about lack for time ...
4 or 5 medium sized cucumbers, peeled and sliced
Marybeth Rotham
Usually the spa stays open until 10pm, but the rules stay the same from open til close: keep quiet and enjoy your “me” time.
No need to time travel. Check
... and the others include a mix of homeware, clothing and accessories - from a washbag (with a zip), to a cushion (with buttons and button holes) to a girls sundress (with a gatherered skirt) to an apron (with an appliqued design). Each project has a photo of the finished item, and step by step instructions with clear illustrations.
Generally, my training has yet to reach a plateau and therefore most races are an improvement on the last one, the question is less about PR, but about reaching new goals. My hope has been for a sub 40 10k, but I have yet to achieve this, and think that even with a really fast run, 41 is more likely, but hey weird stuff happens…
“No, it won’t,” I tell her. “It will all be rinsed out afterwards. When it’s working again.”
Nevertheless, I really want to try and do this again.
I am compiling my bucket list. I plan on posting more when I think of them.
kalamative olives
Nothing better after a long days work than ‘tea and wads’!
My last brewday, two weeks ago, was a double batch of an english style pale ale. I used a new pitch of Wyeast 1318 in one fermenter, and the new Northern Brewer yeast, Neobrittania. The beers were kegged a couple of days ago. The initial tasting results is that the Wyeast 1318 was cleaner tasting and overall a good brew. The neobrittania... well, I tasted a pile of butterscotch...i.e. diacetyl. I knew that my fermentation temps were below Wyeast's recommended range, but I didn't sweat it because my experience the Wyeast 1318 was that it would ferment low and still taste good. NOT so with the Neobrittania. Also, for some reason I am tasting a bit of cardboard with the NB beer, it isn't bad, but I thought I was careful not to introduce oxygen after the fermentation. Oh well, the next beer I brew I'll be more careful. till then, cheers!
Governor signs brewery tasting room bill
After every use, cutting boards should be washed with hot, soapy water and then rinsed with clear water and air dried. If you’re going to pat them dry, be sure to use un-used paper towels, but not your kitchen dishtowel. The dishtowel will probably have been used and filled with bacteria you want to keep from your cutting board.
what more can I ask for in life than a group of friends who would learn ridiculously cheesy dances choreographed by yours truly… on my best friend’s drive way AND willingly perform these cheesy dances in front of the whole camp the next day?
5: Yawn without covering your mouth. Contrary to popular opinion, ghosts are scared of nasty human teeth.
Bake at 400F for 5 to 9 minutes or until edges are light brown. Immediately remove from cookie sheets.
actuallly heres what i was originally going to write:
The larger one is for games and game pieces that go along with the week. All the game pieces that I've laminated and cut out go in the pockets for the story.
There was all that ghastly nonsense with babies, too. They were expected to come forth with the regularity of a harvest, the fruits of plantings provoked more by a father’s pleasure than a mother’s desire to continue her beloved miscreant’s line. Horrible, horrible, Mary-Emma thought as she imagined great globes of muslin-swathed bellies emptying their contents into the world amid a violent stew of noise and mess. No, no man would do that to her. She was not to be used in that fashion. She was not to be used at all.
“For example,” Smelly said smugly. “When they tar and chipped the last time they had big piles of stone just outside of town. I went there a couple of nights and loaded a couple of wagons full and restoned my driveway.”
The lady doctor lingered and looked at me. while she waited for the phone. I don’t know what she thought we were doing (awkward laughing is all). I mean, she managed to creep up right as I was sneaking in a butt scratch (while the male doctor looked away). It kind of confirmed my suspicion.
At Lincoln’s second inaugural address on March 4th, 1865, we see a deeply changed man. The four years of war, with over half a million troops dead on both sides, had taken its toll on him. He was frail, looking older than his fifty-six years. But he was also a changed man spiritually and mentally. He had gone to war not wishing to free the slaves, but with the war nearing its end, he was now the “Great Emancipator,” the man who had used the scourge of war to end the scourge of human bondage. He was also closer to his Heavenly Father than ever before, and his speech reflected his changing beliefs. When he spoke, he did not call for vengeance, but for peace. When the war ends, he wanted things to go back to how they were, except for slavery. He did not want to punish the south for the war; both sides had a hand in it, and both sides should share the blame for it. Lincoln wanted the men from both armies to return home, and start their lives anew the best they could, and try to put this awful war behind them. Alas, his views for a peaceful transition were not to be.
February 20, 2012 – Monday
We walked down the streets of Bath towards the pump house.
Girl has to get rid of her amazing dog.
8:42 - Paul takes issue with people who say the bailout of General Motors worked: "That's like saying someone who robbed a bank was successful! You still broke the law to do it."
Where were you when he was 18 and how come you didn't know that he had a pistol?
From one of his own. In the words of Camille Paglia, in her in her response to a reader on Salon.com "Bow-ow-ow: Obama's painful missteps"
And please, please explain to me why these children are not in the homes where they are so very wanted, with parents that would give anything for a child to read a bedtime story to? To people who want with every fiber of their being to have a child to change, bathe, feed, nurture, love, and lose sleep over, MAKE SACRIFICES FOR?
For some reason I own only one of his books. It is not amongst his best known. It is called The Enduring Revolution. The idea behind the title is that history’s revolutions come and go, but Jesus is the one who revolutionises the human heart. Christ began an enduring revolution because the changes that he brings to the inside of a person continue to this day.
I Bang (Reaganomics), I Hum (Hank Williams)
Game 2: Texas 7 Toronto 8 - Teaxas fought the lawrie and the Lawrie won (thanks MLB for that headline!).
PRO TIP: Since most tumblr layouts have an endless scrolling, you should always remember to include a back to top button for tumblr, this way you let your visitors navigate your site much easier.
Not only is there a centurion in command but also he is mentioned by name and identified as of Augustus’ band, a member of the Praetorian Guard. So why is he identified? Paul was one noteworthy prisoner as we have seen in his preparation to be sent to Caesar. It was the governor Festus of Caesarea who arranged for the Roman provision.
“Everything is acceptable, no matter what it is.” As much as I am in favor of religious freedom, I always get angry when I happen on this sentence again. On one side it’s nice – you can do whatever seems right for you, even if it looks wrong to you. But try getting more exact response and you don’t know if just laugh or cry. We are like neutered to have an opinion or accept history as factual evidence. I often see this in writing communities too – do whatever you want. How is that helpful to anyone? We don’t learn from it, we’re left to sink in that mud hole others call street, but crossing it is even harder because others won’t help us to the house we need to go and all this together we’ll be late for our appointment.
Come out and have a good time with us!
3) Vilnius Gin - this must be made in the city of Vilnius, Lithuania. Today, there is only one Vilnius Gin, which has been produced for the last 30 years at the Vilnius Degtiné distillery.
Now that the technical definition and information are said, here are a few great links I found using the search term: Bonsai, and Bonsai Wallpaper.
The sound of music hard to face
Is it a good book? Of course, but that is pretty much a given, and not the question I'm trying to answer for myself here. Do I like it? Yes, but... There is a lot to like about Sense and Sensibility, not least the metaphorical rope Austen gives her characters, allowing them to commit social suicide at their leisure, but I have a few reservations which affected my enjoyment of the book.
There will no doubt come a time in my out years when my water balloon permanently springs a leak and I’ll be requiring some assistance in the personal hygiene area. Perhaps I should hire myself a fanny physio now?
Though I know the torment that’ll come tomorrow
Avocado
The United States government recently blocked virologist Ron Fouchier from releasing the blueprints to develop heavily weaponized H5N1 bird flu virus thanks to pressure stemming from the alternative media, but now a new group of scientific labs have begun to recreate the findings and may release them to the public.
The rest of the world – including car parking space delineations - was not much interest to her. She had far more important things to occupy her mind than mere rules and regulations, especially those universal laws of physics that seemed to do so much to thwart her desires. Still, though, she did get her shopping done, which in the great cosmic scheme of things is – after all – what really matters.
In her preaching Lucretia Mott avoided theological questions & stressed “practical righteousness.” It is clear, however, that her thought was steadily maturing toward a position considerably in advance of the views of most Hicksite Friends & approximating the “rational supernaturalism” of the Unitarians. Her reading of Noah Worcester & William Ellery Channing contributed to this development, but not more than her study of certain early Quaker writers such as William Penn.
Don’t forget to vote in Independent Weekly’s 2012 Best of the Triangle survey. The survey allows you to vote for your favorite local North Carolina businesses, people, and locations in 7 categories: Wine & Dine, Music & Clubs, Out & About, Goods, Services, Media, and a comment section. The results will be printed in the Best of the Triangle issue of Independent Weekly on June 6th, 2012. The final day to vote is April 15th, 2012 at 11:59pm.
Bestow this jewell also on my creature,
These triple cotton bias skirts are what I'll be wearing in lieu of jeans, they are my casual wear.
She doesn’t say, but it’s easy to assume, that such a mom is supported by a hardworking spouse. The unspoken assumption about fathers, unchanged since the Leave it to Beaver days, rears its head: the primary function of a father is to pull in the bucks.
As the kids say, that would be way cool.
Getting soaked;
23.01.82 Leicester University
4 centuries
I wonder if that’s true
he bounded ahead.
Let us go then, you and I,
darkness falls –time to light
So anyway, as I was saying, it looks like two of the obscenity-based intensifiers, fucking and as shit, can go with either predicative or attributive adjectives, while ass is limited to attributives. This peculiarity of ass may be a relic of its origin. Patricia O’Conner writes on her Grammarphobia blog that the original ass-suffixed adjective was big, and at first it was written big-assed, and referred to people that had big asses. She cites the Oxford English Dictionary‘s first attestation, from 1944:
Can I be better?
I seem to have arrived at a space in my life when I can't visualise being able to work anywhere and for anyone. Ever. Don't get me wrong. I'm not lazy. It's just that I can no longer handle compromising on my autonomy. I feel this so strongly that in the last year or so that I was working every fibre of my being screamed out that I was doing something fundamentally WRONG! It was a good organisation with some wonderful people. If I can't hack it there ...
Big scent of Orange peel, Meadow Foam Honey (Vanilla), lemon/coriander, Sugary toffee, spicy hops and hint of vanilla sweetness. Beautiful. Perfume. Fresh flowers.
“On the whole we have a very good relationship with the local population who have always shown us fantastic support.”
I used two shades of reds--
I would imagine that most track fans are considering this a coup of sorts for the sport as Anderson is a young rising star in the sport. The Washington State junior, has already won a World Jr championship over the 400 meter hurdles (2008), as well as NCAA championships as a frosh and soph (2008, 2009) over the barriers. He has personal bests of 48.47 over the barriers and 46.08 over the flat 400 meters. At 20 years of age (he turns 21 in June) Mr. Anderson has a very bright future in the sport and I too am happy at the news for the sport of track and field.
Tums Freshers $1.50/1
What kind of parent am I or do I want to be? If you’re already a parent, what kinds of things work for you now? Did they always? Has your view of what kind of parent you are changed? If you’re pregnant or TTC, have you given this topic much thought? What is your style likely to be? Are you a structure sort of person? Will you or did you cry-it-out? Will you or did you try to get your baby on a schedule? Did you or will you demand feed? Did you or will you subscribe to a method like Attachment Parenting or Babywise or some other method? Do you think you can spoil a baby by holding it too much?
· small bunch of rosemary, roughly torn
Now try generating your own images based on the sounds of the following names:
Pour the Guinness into a large saucepan. Add the butter and heat gently until the butter is melted. Remove from the heat.
Coarse salt and pepper
Marcelo Barbosa Alcaraz (Brazil), Nasce o blog
and more wow!
So, on this Tacky Music Monday here are Mikhail Baryshnikov and our patron saint Liza Minnelli with their fabulously energetic version!
Someone will also be an observer,
9. Single Man Riot - Run For It
My dearest friends,
I am making no changes to the content, save using modern script and changing the punctuation and capitalizing in places for ease of reading. Since the book is out of print, it is part of the public domain.
It means that, as popular and seemingly appealing as universalism and we’re-all-okay mentality is in our world . . I can’t accept it. I know that Christ is the Path to life, and all other paths lead to Hell. To pretend otherwise to people headed for Hell would be absolutely cruel.
As I beckoned the children to witness this spectacle we witnessed a male fairy in a rose bush busily snacking: "he's getting aphids" my daughter excitedly suggested.
This absolutely STUNNING key is a gift from my pal Bente Fagerberg, isn't it just totally scrummy?! thank you so so much sweetie!
Cleaned up someone else's trash.
Below is a letter that I sent out to students on Tuesday:
Double Points beginning with 2nd stay. No limits.
And took away my breath from me.
Simply put,
A few months later I realized I needed to find a new solution for his clothing storage. I had installed really cool slide out bins in the closet, but many of them were too tall for the Bub to get to.
He said this as if his other threats of beating had lacked substance. She doubted that, but was concerned only with this threat.
They are literally everywhere and at every price point, from Forever 21 and Old Navy, to J.Crew and Express. Since I'm not sure how colored jeans and I will get along, I'll probably start with an inexpensive pair. And while my closet is full of bright colors, and I don't shy away from mixing vibrant hues and patterns, for some reason I feel like taking baby steps with this trend.
In a series of fifteen-minute episodes, Dick Barton and his chums work their way into the gang of black marketeer Spider Kennedy, who has a nasty habit of blowing up trains. Rather than the originals transmitted between 1946 and 1951, these are re-recordings produced for overseas transmission in 1949. Occasional line fluffs are not a problem, but do suggest these were recorded very quickly. Though there’s buzzing in places, the sound is good for such an old recording – particularly when it comes to the blood-curdling death screams.
You can find virtually every color and pattern in shower curtains these days. Here are some of my favorites shower curtain-to-drapes contenders.
Hmmm..I am confused. You mean you have to pay a fee to register your children at State schools?
The ongoing restitution of the Norwegian masonic library and archives
Release on February 4th, 2011!!
32. The Ledger of Life - Argosy 4 parts Jun 30, Jul 7, 14, 21
People talk about politicians living in the ‘Westminster bubble’. But the real bubble is London itself. Unusually, all our elites overlap in one place. London is effectively New York, LA and Washington all rolled into one — the capital of finance, culture and politics.
Yes, I thought, looking at the vulture, my Restaurant is all that – thank you! The vulture is not the only coincidence to befall me in writing Talina in the Tower. The villains in the book are strange wolf-like creatures who seem to be French, seem to be magical and seem to have mysterious rights over the city of Venice. I coined the name Ravageurs for them because they ravage everything they come across and feel themselves entitled. Checking the name on the internet, I found that it was the name given to a small French parasite that preys on vines. That seemed entirely suitable. But more recently I discovered on the internet a perfume called Musc Ravageur, by Editions Parfums Frederic Malle. Poste-haste went I to Liberty’s to smell its tangy, vivid aroma, redolent of amber, lavender, bergamot, clove, cinnamon, Gaiac wood, cedar, sandalwood, tonka and musk. (My Ravageurs smell of raw rotten meat, unfortunately.)
I had paid my way to Mexico by pan handling cookies
Vance’s office quickly got its own letter off, asking with large tongue in bulging cheek, “If you really do possess the kind of information you suggest that you do, we trust you will forward it immediately to the district attorney’s office”. In other words, “put up or shut up” – but it’s all good knockabout stuff.
Wolf.
Saturday 16 April, Clayfields Sports Centre, Claypits Lane, Dibden, Southampton, Hampshire.
My least favourite part is the "Rooms of Doom"™ day, but I figure Idol needs to have a day of drama, so I tolerate it.
Verdict: Ho Hum, except the pineapple
she will cross and recross
Franklin Graham also said that Christians need to pray for leaders in the U.S., and that we need people “who will put God’s standards above everything else and who will take us back to the God of our fathers.”
There is a right way, and a wrong way, to make new friends.
1 existed
Entrepreneur Chick is reading a very famous businessman's book over again.
You will, most likely, be worried about the interview. With every day the pressure will seem to build up.
I’m not proposing such a radical change as to allow people to be floating off into the sky, never to return (though that might be nice to contemplate for certain pop singers, maniacal dictators and the loud woman with the twangy accent who sits next to me at work). I’ll leave it for the Tea Partiers and other radical thinkers to contemplate what that kind of world would be like. I acknowledge that there’s a need for at least some gravity — just not as much as we have now.
One day I will form my own cult, and I will have minions, and followers, and maybe even a standing army…… But first I have to develop some Super Secret Rituals and Stuff. Gotta have something special for the Inner Circle. It will have to be acroamatic, of course, with severe penalties for imparting the learnings outside the Circle.
My mom passed away this past October 28th after a 2 year long battle with stage 4 breast cancer. I found out that she had breast cancer after I demanded we take her to the ER because she was having chest pains and was scared. I remember for two years, going back and forth from the hospital, the cancer center, the ER, just to make my mom better. She was so strong despite having numerous illnesses after I was born. She was almost cured, too, in September. We were given news that her cancer markers in her body were going down and the tumors in her body were no longer growing. Suddenly, things got worse and my mom couldn’t walk anymore, couldn’t function, couldn’t breathe. Every day I thought she was going to get better, but she never quite did. She would always sharply decline again and it killed me to know she wasn’t the person I remembered her to be. The last time she was in the hospital, all my family, her old friends we hadn’t seen, our neighbors we barely knew, strangers I didn’t know; everyone came to visit her. That, and they came to comfort me and help me to be strong. I wasn’t strong. I was angry. I was heart broken. I was lonely. I was scared. Nothing will ever hurt as much as hearing that she had 3 days to live. Nothing will ever compare to that pain of knowing I’d never see her again.
while we were on the way back home to Kuala Lumpur.
But her first night at Holbrook, she feels strangely connected to the school and the island it sits on, like she's come home. She's even made her first real friends, but odd things keep happening to them. Every morning they wake on the floors of their dorm rooms with their hands stained red.
I attended the 4 day module with 3 other participants at Lindel’s home in Roehampton. On arrival, I was taken aback by the atmosphere of deep peace and serenity in the seminar room. At the start of the seminar we were each issued a DVD and a 170 page manual, which we were given to keep, as these provide details of the concepts, meditations and spiritual initiations that would be covered during the seminar. The contents of the seminar relate to many of the concepts detailed in “The Keys of Enoch” and “The Melchizidek Method”.
Phelon Jones, Jacksonville Jaguars
DW: Now a lot of people who read about this stuff online, the vast majority in fact – including most of the guests Jeff Rense or Alex Jones would have on – feel there is an incredible sense of futility.
When I told him that I didn't think we'd be around for me to drop the kids off and that Brooklyn was the only one who would even want to go, he blamed it on me. He said that "my opinions of him made it difficult for him to focus on the kids". Oh sure, because I think he's a deadbeat loser, he can't focus on the kids. The fact that the reason I think he's a deadbeat loser is BECAUSE he abandoned the kids, doesn't matter in his little world. Of course, he's always blamed everything on me. It was my fault he got his third DUI this summer because if I hadn't divorced him, he wouldn't have had to go out drinking. It was my fault he spent thousands of dollars a month at strip clubs because I drove him to do it. It's my fault he lied to me constantly for 20 years.
On top of all that, those fatty, salty, sweet foods that are so bad for us are, on a calorie-for-calorie basis way cheaper than the good stuff.
Mornings are my time of choice for meeting. Since my family is gone during the day, this is the time that least affects them.
I had meetings with clients to discuss projects and most of the calls abroad were scheduled during US times. After discussing I would be given for the day and then the next morning won’t be the normal due to the tiredness from the night hours. I started spending time watching movies at homes to avoid unexpected sleeps and be available for the meeting.
Maybe that makes me old fashioned. But it is what it is. I am not trying to change the world or make an impact with these thoughts. I am just writing what I feel to get my juices flowing. This is mainly for me. Maybe there are more like me...but if there are...I am hoping that they will answer the door when I knock.
And while this big corporate entity is yet another sign of craft brewing's success that puts the "support your local brewer" ethos even further back in brewing's rear window, somehow it doesn't seem threatening. Maybe it's because at The Yardhouse, it seems to be genuinely about the beer.
That’s the crime of it. McReynolds was a good player. I’m sure if he didn’t return to the Mets, we might have looked back on him more objectively. Of course, until he returned fat and out of shape, and had his wife call into the WFAN radio to berate Howie Rose for suggesting his weight gain might have caused some gaffes in the field.
"I'm them," he said Friday as he fought back tears. "Being accepted to college is the first step to changing their lives and their communities."
Originally I'd intended to use regular right angle weave for the ribbon, but as soon as I started filling the center, that fell by the wayside. Regular raw increases would be much cleaner and symmetrical, as opposed to the slightly wonky ribbon I ended up with. Since I stitched the ribbon on after, using entirely new thread, I can always cut it off and try again. But I think I'll let it stand as is for now. Creativity can be a little wonky.
Additional alternatives, according to the Postal Service, include mail delivery to affected customers via rural carrier or highway contract route; contracting with a local business for a village post office; and offering service from a nearby post office.
The only way I can read this story and make Jesus’ behavior make any sense is to see it as a possible teaching moment for those who were listening. I think this way based on Jesus’ openness to healing those outside the Jewish faith. He didn’t hesitate to heal the Centurians child, or Legion. In John 4, it states that Jesus “HAD” to go through Sammaria, which resulted in his encounter with the woman at the well, when clearly that wasn’t the best way to travel. So it would make no sense that all of a sudden Jesus had nothing to offer this woman.
Faisal was deported to Jamaica in 2007 for urging the murder of Jews, and Bakri fled to Lebanon in 2005 after praising the 7/7 bombers. Rabble-rousers Abu Izzadeen, just out of jail for inciting terrorism, and Anjem Choudary, who urges Sharia law in the UK, were to address followers in person.
Grads are encouraged to stop by the library and check on any new scholarship opportunities. Please be mindful of the deadlines.
Thank You for joining me for Tea Time Tuesday
Other than that battle it's been just another Monday spent lamenting the passing of another weekend and the pitiful amount of work that got done in it. For your entertainment I thought I'd pass along a site that a friend shared with me. It's called Free Cabin Porn.com and is PG 13 at best, I promise. Check it out for some great ideas about living the simple (but not necessarily mobile) life.
Her body was brutally ravaged
This year, I vowed that I would spare no expense and do something enviably awesome for spring break, to make up for all of the spring breaks past, when I did nothing but wallow in my squandered free time. And what did I end up doing? Working three final shows of Henry V and then driving twelve hours for an audition that lasted ten minutes. Alas.
xoxo-
The vast majority of people (70 or 80%) who visit the Grand Canyon, visit only the more accessible South Rim, and spend less than half a day there. We were in the minority. We spent 3 full days in the Grand Canyon, two of which were at the much less visited North Rim.
It's not the "ghost" that troubles,
who sometimes would get there own place mat at the table.
I wish I could buy this outfit as it is.. but as I'm back to the nasty British pound I guess this will remain a dream...
8 Murray Theatre, Salt Lake City, UT
Out of shock, she drops the glass which breaks their trance. She stutters in a demand to know who they are which makes them jump in fear. Brawny-Warrior stands in preparation to draw his sword and in defense; Park Ha grabs a frying pan! Ha!
Andi Alpers is on the edge. She's angry at her father for leaving, angry at her mother for not being able to cope, and angry at the world for taking her younger brother, Truman. Rage and grief are destroying her. And her father has determined that Andi's accompanying him to Paris over winter break is the solution to everything.
It is impossible to single out any current style, format, or subject matter as definitive. Some of the more common practices in English include:
Hoping I'll wear these a bit more now they're more interesting, and I've strategically aimed the bleach at a couple of stains that wouldn't come out any other way, so they don't look so grubby now either.
The Beginning of the story takes place in Italy with a goal of learning Italian. This section functions on a sensory level with lots of eating great bread and pastries, drinking wine, and meeting terrific men. Of the three sections, Italy is the least challenging for the author, which is fine because this is where we find out her issues: she has had a spiritual crisis, which ended in a divorce and followed by an unfulfilling relationship.
In the prescientific world of 1796, a physician known as Samuel Hahnemann in Germany proposed the basic laws of a practice we all know today as homeopathy. This practice was based on the ‘law of similars’; the idea that ‘like can be cured by like’, which, as we all know, must mean that eating lots of cake cures type 2 diabetes.
Rukeyser's style feels prosy, in part to make it widely approachable. She wanted the widest audience possible, so that national opinion would be swayed and her readers would put pressure on leaders to regulate industries that were poisoning workers. Here are two sections from that poem sequence.
of this deliverance
for being yourself is the best way.
So, are any of you guys in the background of this little video? I'm dying to know if you're there!
The stereotypes about disability here are pretty well-worn: according to this (fictional) backstory, the twins were “discovered by” and need “help” from two abled individuals, Palmer and Webley, to realize their musical potential. Add to this their “inspiring” origin story — which is fodder for a graphic novel tie-in — and you’ve got yourself one hell of a three-ring circus of disability stereotypes.
We made it 2 minutes before the train left. Pure relief flooded my body as we plopped in our seats. As we pulled up to Machu Picchu, we realized it was all worth it. It was one of the most glorious sites I've ever seen. How the ancient Incas created all of this on the side of a mountain, I will never understand.
"Iran lives in self-denial and as if it is an angel free of defects and flaws. Psychologically, those suffering from superiority complex believe they can set a good example for others to copy," he wrote.
And lastly, these are the hands that, even when wrinkled and aged,
It's a good week for risotto lovers and vegans because Rebecca is also sharing a vegan friendly risotto. With a gorgeous summery feel, it's flavoured with fresh aromatic herbs, mint, dill and chives.
2/3 of the way through now and feeling pretty good, other than this damn cold I seem to have caught.
That's it for my Our Creative Corner piece this week. I hope you will stop by the OCC blog and maybe even hop through the DT's blogs and leave them some love. Lots of beautiful butterfly art to see this week!
And here comes the best part: You do not need an ice cream maker for this recipe. In fact, you should not use it, as the mixture is too thick for the machine to handle. You don't need any hard-to-find ingredients like liquid nitrogen, either. You simply pour it into a container, press plastic wrap against the surface to create an airtight seal and place it in the freezer. It never gets icy. In fact, this will also be "The Creamiest Chocolate Ice Cream You'll Ever Have."
March 25th, 2010 I was sitting at lunch with some friends from work when my cell phone rang and I was told that there was a little boy waiting for us to be his parents. I remember saying over and over "I have to go and call Brad" while our amazing social worker was trying to give me information and tell me what to do next! My heart raced! We went down to the agency to take a look at all of the information about this little man and see his pictures. I still remember seeing his beautiful eyes... and I can still feel the excitement of that moment. The next 24 hours were so much fun telling our loved ones about our new son! And the next 3 and half months were long, but full of busyness as we prepared for the trip of a life time.
Mark: You're older than I am. Just so you know.
1 1/2 Sticks (12 tablespoons) Cold Unsalted Butter, cut into small pieces
As I headed into the grove, instead of just the empty sanctuary, I saw this gentleman and his Christmas tree. He was carefully taking the ornaments off of the tree and placing them in a plastic bucket. It was quite cold outside and he had a lot of ornaments to take off of the tree, so I asked him if he needed any help. He looked surprised and happy, so together we spent at least an hour undecorating the tree and talking.
The only ones I don’t like are the “Super Girls.” You know the type. The writer begins to set the character up as a normal girl…then suddenly has to add she’s got a masters degree, spent two years on a mission field, exercises regularly, snacks on celery, never has chocolate cravings, and, oh yeah, speaks multiple languages. A lot of times these things don’t really have much to do with the story. It’s like the writer just feels a girl can’t be a hero if she doesn’t have tons of credential behind her. That’s about the time I disconnect.
In fact, this strategy isn’t that new.
And the prophesies that fall.
Someone to rejoice with you during your highs, and encourage you during your lows (or to give you a kick in the pants, when a soft touch won’t cut it, apparently).
Arugula is a strongly flavoured green, full of peppery notes. The buttermilk vinaigrette should have tempered the pepper, but due to the scant amount applied to the salad, it was arugula overload. The thin slices of pickled peppers were unnoticeable -- until you bit into one. Their bitterness did nothing to balance the dish. The salty onions simply overpowered everything on the plate including that beautiful, tender, succulent steak. The steak though, on its own, was divine.
This Shany image is a real winner! It’s from plate SH24. The image comes out so clean and crisp. It would be really pretty over a bright color too!
And soon I’ll return to racing backed by the boys and girls of Ninkasi Brewing Company. A new job is in the works and the love of my friends will be my battle armor in this crusade.
— Albert Einstein
I will be tweeting the usual mundane stuff about hospital visits etc. :-) but will include general updates on status etc. as part of that. Plus geek boy that I am will likely start turning some attention to interesting (well to me anyway) technology & gadgets...
↓ A R B Y ↓ A Y
With the revolutions failure, the old regimes aimed to placate the moderate liberals through economic, legal, and cultural reforms which ended the revolutionary motives of the bourgeoisie. The liberals then used these reforms to create private enterprises and industries; furthermore, with advancements in technology, especially steam power, and the construction of the railroads, the entire globe became part of the capitalist economy. The results of the capitalist period were wide and far reaching as agricultural land became incorporated into the world economy and technology and science increased yields and the ability to transport food worldwide. Steamships and railroads allowed men and women to relocate across the globe to locate better opportunities particularly to the vast openness of the United States.
Turning to my other classmate, she asked, “Twice?”
Chairman Alan Greenspan (SMOM).
Tonight, we had our first failed guild event. There is some debate over exactly why the event failed, but one thing is for certain, it did not go as planned. If it had gone as planned, it would have been awesome, and for a few brief moments, it was!
1 holiday
…And having LOVED every minute of it, I re-watched it again and again, while waiting for my copy of Jon Hassler’s book to make its way to my mailbox. Having made its way to said mailbox, I was just a little bit hesitant, hoping that the book would be everything that the movie promised, and afraid that it wouldn’t be. That Jon Hassler’s written characters might not be as vivid and moving as Angela Lansbury’s staunch
turn inside out and sew velcro on it as well as onto the body.
There are lots of classes and events coming up this year in Australia From Brisbane to Perth, so for more info on upcoming classes please visit the Australian Copic Events listings here. I know that you will have a great experience taking a class from any of these fabulous ladies. There is so much great information available, and you can be assured that they are teaching the same official certification program that we have here in North America.
Milano, Teatro Tenda Lampugnano - March 29, 1984
1977
Keep it away from human touch
Wolfgang Hampel interviewed Betty MacDonald's family and friends and many other famous artists and writers. Wolfgang Hampel is also famous for his satirical poems and stories.
I spoke next, and detailed three important campaigns for which our party must prepare in 2012, namely; the local elections on May 3rd, the mayoral referendums which will be held on the same day, as well as the elections on 15th November to elect police commissioners.
Cook potatoes whole in a pot of salted water and blanch beans in the same pot towards the end.
But “ultimately,” she said, ”I want to be back in Malaysia.”
Still here goes:
While I have faith I will run better than I am currently anticipating, I know it’s going to be a tough haul. It also won’t be my absolute bestest effort ever considering my training has been a little lackluster. So, I am re-evaluating my goals. This is not something I do lightly – in typical Amy-fashion, I like to go all out and just see what happens. Part of me will still do this but I am going to go easy on myself mentally when I don’t “magically” pull out a PR that is NOT possible based on my current running/fitness level.
I am happy to have this resource in my library to help figure out what my dreams are trying to tell me!
Again, just a brief reminder that everyone linking is pouring their hearts out and we should all be respectful in our comments. ;)
History Buzz January 25, 2012: James Davis: Civil War lecture to be history professor’s last at Illinois College History Buzz January 25, 2012: Kenneth Swopes: Ball State professor recalls his sabbatical in China & research on Ming Dynasty Full Text January 25, 2012: President Barack Obama’s Speech on the Blueprint for Manufacturing at Conveyor Engineering and Manufacturing in Cedar Rapids, Iowa Full Text January 25, 2012: First Lady Michelle Obama’s Remarks at U.S. Department of Agriculture’s New School Lunch Nutrition Standards Announcement at Parklawn Elementary School
That’s right! LIVE ! On tape from Caesar’s Palace, Perthshire (Scotland), we welcome you to the first Maroons of the 21st century.
“It’s not as simple as just reporting numbers. We actually went through an audit similar to what our publications go through. All of the logs and reports needed to be pulled together and provided to ABC so they could actually analyze the delivery and logs for the newsletters and our Google Analytics reports for the website,” Moore said.
Took a cab back to hotel and packed my newly bought purchases n off to airport.
Speaking of paranoia, I really just mean how I’m wont to over-analyze people’s reactions (or lack thereof) to me. “Oh, she didn’t say hi, maybe she doesn’t like me. Or maybe she’s mad at me. Did I do something wrong? Is she trying to avoid me?”
Think of Valentines day as the Super Bowl for women.
8) Cook the rice in the rice cooker.
Seeing just how much You’ve done
Later another friend C. picked me up and we drove to a place where a woman channels spirit guides and angels. I sat on the floor, and my friend K. rested her feet on my thigh. The room was filled with women, a few men I had never met, most of whom I consider my friends, my confidantes, the people I laugh with, have called crying, who know a little bit about every little nasty bit of me. I know them the same way. We share something in common.
Enjoy, and wait till Monday to see what I bought !
3 N.Y.C
I'm that mom who is my children's friend.
I have used Pion paper for this card and I've added some dies to it from:
You’re still asking, “Where’s all this going?”
post where you stated the following?
I constructed reservoirs of water for myself from which to irrigate a grove of flourishing trees.
Oh, come on, boy!
At ‘nearly’ doing stuff.
After much deliberation, all of course with myself since like hell I’m going to bring in any outside sources on this certain topic to dictate my decision, I have now declared for my first major in college. As of right now I’m a pre-journalism major at my college. What that title entails is I have to now take 3 courses (I’ve already taken one) and successfully pass them all with at least Cs and my overall GPA has to at least be a straight B (3.0) and I will officially become a full-time major in one of four categories (I’m going with straight Journalism right now).
it should not be used to carry on a conversation, and I will tell you why.
My cousin, Shasta, bought Sheldon when he was just a baby when she was on Spring Break in Florida several years ago. She then passed him onto some friends of ours, Dan & Jennifer. They kept him for their boys in their home until they moved recently out of state. They decided to not take him when they moved, so he needed a new home. That is where we come in.
How we keep things fun at the office:
So now what? Why the change in my tone all of a sudden? Wasn't I the happy forum member who didn't give a damn about the drama that was going on? No, not really. I just stayed out of the complaints box for my own sake. I had enough of it just flicking through the thread headings. Mid-last year, I still had a lot of hope in PTI and kept quite positive. I thought there was room to turn back and make things right. But all that has happened since is that they've dug a deeper hole than they started with. Yes, some things are starting to get fixed. But the damage has been done. I don't think PTI will ever recover completely. It takes quite a lot (A LOT) to get me to write something like this. In fact, it is near impossible. I've been disappointed far too many times. Mostly indirectly, but imagine what it'd be like those who never got their anniversary sets, never got the refund, got banned from forum and never had their questions answered promptly.
…able to face my day without fear.
Though there are a few spots where the album tends to drag a bit, the opening four songs have rarely been matched for impact. The first three—”Where the Streets Have No Name”, “I Still Haven’t Found What I’m Looking For”, and “With or Without You”—perfectly encapsulated many of the feelings I had within me as I approached the next chapter of my life, one in which my place in the world as I knew it was unsettlingly undefined.
Thanks A Million for your great support and interest!
Punches (Fiskars, EK Success)
-You FINALLY appreciate all the hard work and sacrifices your mom made for you, and pray you can do half as good of a job for your own kids!
Recently I ordered 10 panels of a nice modern grommeted drape from Overstock, along with a pewter colored rod and tiebacks. Once they came, I realized that the choice I made would not fit the room...so I returned all but the rods.
Electricity is the biggest problem, I feel, because it’s so “invisible”. Over 60% of our country’s electricity comes from coal. (Here in Chicago, it’s mostly nuclear-generated, but Com Ed is still buying coal generated electricity on the open market to make up for energy shortfalls.) You may not see the smoke stacks belching NOx, SO2, lead, mercury or CO2 — but they are there nonetheless – and some where down the line you windup paying part of the indirect costs of all that un-needed and non-sustainable electrical generation — through higher health insurance premiums, higher government Medicare costs and health care programs, and higher health care costs in general.
Pretty ride in. Real deal Christmas trees on the side of the road!
(Why do people hold hope in such high regard? I do not understand. If I could resign myself to an inevitable–no matter how cruel–I could let go, and avoid the mocking pain of daily expectation dashed, and fractured, and dashed again. But hope keeps dancing–perhaps today! or today! or?–and I like a fool keep gasping on.)
This week the Design Team are showcasing American Crafts and/or Martha Stewart products. If you have either of these two products, we would love to see them in your projects this week but if not, please come and join us anyway !!
I want to leave you with two burning questions: How are you perceived by your employer? Would you hire you? One of the Styling Your Life™ principles is reliability.
Fills our ordinary lives with meaning and provides different feelings as they have different purposes.
Here is an example of what your command prompt window will look like in most Windows Operating Systems. The Operating System that I am using is Windows 7 just for your information. As you see in the example, Type ipconfig to view all of your IP information. From this menu you will be able to see your IPv4 address, IPv6 address, Subnet Mask, and Gateway. This information is useful in trying to troubleshoot network problems. Let’s see another screen shot with my IP information.
For some reason, they were struck by the desire to do something that someone would appreciate. I immediately began thinking of the catchphrase "random acts of kindness" as a way to explain it. I'm a big fan of random acts of kindness, but in a way I think the phrase is misleading. While the act itself, or the person they chose to bestow it upon, may be "random" in that it was spontaneous, the idea of doing something kind is anything but random.
so back in march we attended another open house.
Buddha: right? let’s not talk about it though.
While initially a somewhat reluctant public spokesperson for same-sex partnerships, Kerryn Phelps has worked long and hard to bring them the equal respect they deserve. Her stirring speech to open the 2011 Mardi Gras in Sydney directly challenges the Prime Minister’s view that marriage is only between a man and a woman.
jen xx"
4. Pick a side to start rolling on and roll your tortilla up. On my first one I had some turkey hanging out (as you can see in the picture), so I adjusted how I had my turkey so that it was all wrapped up inside. Place a toothpick in the middle so that your wrap doesn’t unwrap and you’re done!
I'd like to show you. This, my library friends, is how the pros make over their homes!
Martha Stewart Punch - Branch Leaf
1. Food. This includes non-perishable items, candy, and anything else that could be shipped faraway without melting or spoiling.
The best husband a girl can hope for; an amazing love affair…
We're well past the equinox and the sun makes itself known around 3.30am, setting some time after 10 at night. There aren't many clouds up this way at the moment and the snow is starting to melt. Most of the ice is already gone, but months of snowfall takes longer to thaw. It turns into a blanket of brittle glittering crystals before it finds its way back into being water. Where days ago I could walk on the surface, I now fall through to my knees. Sheets of snow which have been hanging like awnings over the edge of houses fall away. Massive clumps come sliding down off the roof and thump on the wooden boards of the house's veranda, where I sit writing this, wearing a jacket, a hat and fingerless gloves.
And if I’m not then you’re unreasonably fearful of me.
Twenty-three attacks were recorded on the schools during the last semester. Many of the expatriates either quit Bahrain with families or sent their children back home. They think the kids will be safe in the boardings or with their grandparents. Actually, the attacks on the schools were a major scare tactic, as it wasn’t directly aimed at the children. The education ministry organised counselling sessions to get the kids back to school.
Boyd won 47 games for Boston from 1983 to1986. In 1985, he recorded15 victories and posted career-highs in games started (35), complete games (13), strikeouts (117) and innings pitched (272.1). He won a career-high16 games in 1986, but after three disappointing seasons, Boyd signed with the Expos as a free agent and won 10 games with a career-best 2.93 ERA in 1990. He finished his career with a disappointing season in Texas.
I accept the fact that I won’t be able to publish until I have a connection, yet I continue to be amazed I can even access the application…
From left to right....
Velveeta does not melt well when baked. What it does, is burn. And at this temperature, it burns rather spectacularly, complete with flames, black smoke and little specks of ash floating around the kitchen; and this is exactly what happened every single time my Aunt Lillian served it. The smell was exactly what you'd expect any milk product in flames to smell like (i.e a sweaty t-shirt covered in baby formula barf and then used to clean a wood stove.) In presentation this dish resembled a well-used manhole cover, the hamburger sticking up in craggy lumps beneath a fragile vitreous glaze of burnt processed cheese-food, the olives laid out all shiny and wizened up on top of the thing like little black Volkswagens caught out by an asteroid strike.
forgiving myself when failure seems to stare me in the face.
corollary: You may buy a new gadget on sale but you could be carrying it home in the dark.
As I had mentioned, Juliette et Justine was not the first brand to release prints along this line. The Otome brand Jane Marple has actually released several pieces that feature large art prints, a recent one featuring what I think is an angel, but there have been a few other religious prints in their past, and even one featuring a very fancy piano.
Asking heaven above me, for an angel to love me
and quite a few in blame
I also picked up the Red Carpet gel nail kit...
I am a recovering agoraphobic. I gave up a job three years ago after the discovery that I could barely leave the house, much less travel a commute, without devastating panic attacks. City hopping, flights to Europe, all the doors of my old life slammed shut at once.
Tonight we’re going to one of regular discos they arrange and Paul will be wearing some of his new clothes but the rucksack will have to wait in the hall until the next day-time session. As you can no doubt imagine, for Paul that can’t come quick enough. He’ll love the disco, though, because dancing is one of the things he really enjoys.
Update: Sam DeBerry sends a note that Seguin was a Texan. So the Mexican hero of the Battle of Puebla was a Texan. You couldn’t make this stuff up — real history is always more interesting than fiction.
Two years later, my grandmother was dying and I was getting down and dirty with aspects of self-destruction through the effigy of a whiskey bottle. She was quite sweet on Lee, and, aside from that luminous, if not misguided, crush, her grandfather died just a few months before. It was then we started talking. Even though I tried to help her get to know my womanizing tattooing friend a little better, we found ourselves becoming friends as well.
And walk.
In the next 30 days, we expect our Legislators to make the crucial decisions on this series of proposals and we all need to be vigilant to preserve the key points.
We'd love to have you join us in the StampFairy challenge this week and it's simple to do. Just create a card or project with paper piecing and enter your creation at the StampFairy Challenge Blog. We will name three winners from the entries that use a StampFairy image from the Shop: 1st place receives 3 StampFairy images of your choice, 2nd place receives 2 images and 3rd place picks 1 image. Challenge entries with non-StampFairy images will be eligible for our Top Three Badge and will be entered into a monthly draw for a free StampFairy image.
the summer before seventh grade i spent as a recluse. i spoke to nobody and ate frozen pizzas underneath a blanket in my dark bedroom. i stole sips of liquor from my dad’s alcohol cabinet. i didn’t shower. i smelled like adolescent death diapers. i never ever left the house, so i wasn’t too worried about the smell i was giving off. at some point i came to resent my smell, but not enough to actually do anything about it – like take a fucking bath. i would spend a few hours a day hanging out of my window and smoking cigarettes that i swiped from my mother’s purse.
For few moments everybody was quiet and looking at ‘that’ girl. As soon as she looked at us, everybody changed their eyesight and again reminded Akshay,
Mississippi – 27.5 percent, 30.7 percent
(L + C⇐)
Someone just asked me on Twitter what I do when I’m depressed.
I didn't quite understand stand it. And it seemed so difficult and complicated. Then, along comes an opportunity for me to attend a workshop on the very subject, that at the thought or mention of, would make me cringe. So what do I do? I volunteer.
The Valentine’s Day Curse…A short story about stirred memories of unrequited love, revealing Valentine’s Day is not always a bed of roses."
CIOs need to change their images from just being technology leaders to leaders who understand business and can apply their strategic IT and business skills to the wider business.
Useful information on wasps and bees – How to identify them and how they live in your garden from The British Beekeepers Association.
Start by making sure that your students know that this is not a game and that they must NEVER play with matches or fire. This is about how to put OUT a fire, and why "Stop, Drop, and Roll" works. Light all three candles. And then...
Sunnies: Nordstrom BP (the best place for cheapies, these were $10!)
This may make a secular person uneasy -- after all, bible-thumping Baptists and Islamist zealots are two sides of the same coin, are they not? Yet there is a difference: fervent Christians have accepted their coexistence with other faiths in America for over two centuries. Can anyone believe that Muslims would reciprocate if the Jihad were to realize its fondest dream?
In the Beginning, and into the Middle of the memoir, the protagonist freely shows her flawed self, which, at times, comes across neurotic enough that if her writing were not so compelling, the reader might not stay with her. However, the more flawed the character, the greater the possibility in the final transformation.
The week itself has been very enjoyable, have revisited a few ‘old friends’, made a few new ones, and was sorry to see a few landmarks from past visits are no more, closed down I assume by the economic crisis, but dont quote me on that.
It should be noted that Mussolini's views in this matter did not at all disqualify him from continuing as a Marxist. Like many other Marxists of his time (See Gregor, 1979), Mussolini tempered his view of the importance of class-solidarity with the recognition that both Marx and Engels had in their lifetimes lent their support to a number of wars between nations (Engels in particular was a pretty virulent German nationalist!). He looked, in other words, not only at broad Marxist theory but also at how Marx and Engels applied their theories. Such "pragmatism" was, of course, a hallmark of Mussolini's thinking. And, like the Communists, Mussolini had no aversion to war.
The Food Network Magazine's latest issue was their "light" issues. I love hummus & when I saw Falafel Crusted Chicken with Hummus Slaw I knew I had to try it. I didn't want to buy falafel mix for just one recipe so I made this chicken instead. The flavor of the slaw was really unique. I love the little "kick" I got from the chili paste. Eric said this is definitely a keeper. Oh & Lyla devoured the chicken.
The card was made with three different collections from Cosmo Cricket (Early Bird, Salt Air and Jolly By Jolly - the banner was made with it)
When the waiter at the restaurant overlooking Notre Dame suggested my husband and I stay for un cafe or another glass of wine, perhaps we should have listened. I'd been sitting with my back to the river and he had a perfect view of the oncoming storm. Hand in hand, JP and I strolled across the bridge while to our left the clouds gathered.
This week we are in for a real treat! Monday Sarah Wauterlek of Sarah Wauterlek Photography will share a little about someone very dear to her heart, Kathi Macias gives some wonderful thoughts on grace, and Cindy Stiverson will finish out the week with some great thought on what the phrase "God Bless You" really means.
Hushed words of worry and not-anger
Head of Ladbrokes Poker, Kate McLennan stated ” “Ladbrokes are on a mission to ‘bring poker to the people’, to simplify and make online poker more accessible, to make it easier to learn and to develop one’s skills and to make it fairer for players. Rake is something which is taken by all poker rooms, and here at Ladbrokes it’s important that we use the fairest method, to suit all levels and types of player. It’s also important to emphasise that this is a change to how rake is allocated, and that there will be no increase to the rake taken. This is a positive beginning to the New Year and I look forward to what will to be an exciting 2010 for Ladbrokes Poker and all our players”.
Wolf Craigs is the only site recorded on the OS maps of southern Scotland which contains two placename elements of ‘Woolf-hole-craig’. On placename evidence alone, there is nothing to distinguish between the candidates for the site of Renwick’s preaching. Where the site in the Pentlands stands out from the other candidates is when it is placed in the context of the evidence for the activities of the Societies and the government’s response to field preachings.
Riley dialed the phone number of the hotel that Nico’s mom had left in case anything happened.
KH: When we play in really small bars in Iceland in front of 200 people, when it's packed it has a really good character.
Feb. 6, 2009
okokokokokokokokokokok DO. NOT. PANIC. You can cry but NO PANIC.
For example, if somebody asks me what I’m doing when I’m working on my novel, I’ll say, “I’m writing.” But if I’m writing notes on characters in To Kill A Mockingbird, I say, “I’m revising.” Even though, when I was writing notes, I was using a pen and paper, and when I was working on my novel I was in fact typing.
There is a saying that goes somewhere along the lines of “It’s not about the destination, but the journey.” I don’t think I worded it correctly, but I am sure you guys know what I mean. Manoa Falls is a perfect example of this. Despite the fact that I was excited and anxious to reach my destination, I was also excited to be surrounded by mother earth’s blanket of nature. The smell of leaves all around you, the nice Hawaiian breeze, and the scenery. The scenery was incredible. I dream of going back there, and exploring other Hawaiian hiking places.
3. MANNERS: Be patient with bar staff. Remember, lots of people will be descending upon a poor crew. They will be working as fast as they can. Also, it is considered very good manners to tip well everywhere you go. This creates good “beerma”.
Well, if the folks at AOL Defense had bothered to read the foundational doctrine publication, ADP 3.0, they’d understand that it isn’t just GEN Dempsey making this stuff up. This is the stated Army doctrine. Wars are fought to achieve political goals. Not surprisingly, the Army thinks you need to involve other governmental agencies to achieve those goals. The Army also argues that leveraging other non-military assets is often key to achieving purely military goals, in support of larger national goals. The Army has long taught commanders to use every tool in the box. The latest doctrine just reminds commanders that not every tool is a hammer. ADP 3.0 also serves to put other agencies on notice that they can’t always just sit on the sidelines, or hunker down in the embassy. ADP 3.0 also recognizes that wars are always fought on someone’s territory, and the Army has to be prepared to work with that host nation, and it’s military and security services.
I used to boil the seitan and it was a hit or miss experience. Sometimes it came out perfectly and sometimes it was soft and jiggly, kind of like meaty jello. But now I've switched to Terry Hope Romero's technique of steaming the seitan and it's so much better. It's firmer and chewier and just perfect. If you don't already have Terry's book, Viva Vegan!, go get it! NOW! I'll wait....
1. Thought of the day: ”If you do not hope, you will not find what is beyond your hopes.” -St. Clement of Alexandra
that week which had gone like a month -
15 nomenclators
Five Reasons to Check Out the Dahle 20606 EC Level 2 Strip Cut Office Paper Shredder
I look forward to your paintings!
1153 D-XI/7/1992. “On Taking Homer and His Achaeans Seriously.” Basic Program Staff Seminar, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Day 1 of the Oregon Brewers Festival is done. I chose to forgo the media preview and instead I spent a lot of time in the Buzz Tent trying beers and visiting with the brewers at the table they have set up on the north side of the tent which is great way to meet the brewers that brewed the beer you're enjoying.
Slight clothes of cotton, but also hot T-shirt if he/she goes in winter station overalls in the south. A jacket slight raincoat can be he very useful although against violent winds and cloudbursts it serves very little. Clothes of long magas against lso amazon inseptos.
"I'll remember", you said,
An elderly patient of mine has recently started showing signs of dementia. One of the more annoying elements of his disease is that he is losing his normal diurnal pattern, which means that he is waking up in the middle of the night and thinking that it's daytime. However recently he took things a step further when he woke in the night and decided to go for a drive. He still has a license, but this does raise the ethical dilemma of those people with early dementia and when to "hand in the license".
It takes place in a modern world, but it references ancient prophecies. The story is told through the eyes of an assistant to one of the five men who ARE the Vessel. It’s basically good guys with powers versus bad undead guys, you know, the usual. The five men start having dreams, vivid dreams, that tell them to meet each other in New York. Which is what the first third is about. Jesse Cannon (A sizzlin hot celebrity) sends his assistant (the narrator) to meet them, since he has to make an appearance on Oprah (did I mention it’s funny too??). They encounter some badass Luna Latum sect, which purpose through the last several centuries has been to protect the Vessel, and quell the badguys, the Hollows, basically, people who never stop dying, but can’t become dead.
Wrong direction? You? But you've been planning this journey for months, maybe even years. Why did you trust her with that map, anyway? Grumbling, you head right against your better judgment, just to see how it turns out.
It wasn’t too often that a job a job called for her shotgun. She preferred her pistol and kept a bag of potatoes in the backseat. The shotgun was loud. It was messy, and neither of those adjectives was conducive to her style. But then again, it wasn’t too often Lamar, her enforcer, didn’t answer his phone. Over the past few months they’d found, killed, and captured more murders, rapists, racists, drug lords, and armed robbers than the police ever could. That simple fact now made them both heroes and targets. But it was the name of the game, and the streets never played fair.
powers defy ;
‘Voola mon shoe, Mr Pearse.’
All things here are of hopes and dreams,
Nice getting to know you, and thanks for allowing me to share my thoughts.
(I plan on just tossing the diapers into the wet bag instead of the grocery bags now. I am just going to hang the wet bag in her room since it zips shut. I will wash the wet bag with the diapers.)
they are vexatious to the spirit.
Week 1: Introduction - Today is a general introduction. On Friday, I’ll post short descriptions of the spiritual beliefs we’ll be looking at (though I’m sure everyone is familiar with most of them).
And not bad, being seated between Jack Nicholson and Frankie Valli, with Carl Lewis behind us, and one of my favorites, Danny DeVito, next to Frankie. I was disappointed that Philip Roth didn't make it. He is surely one of America's finest novelists. Not to mention that our mothers went to high school in Elizabeth together.
Take a egg roll wrapper, with a point facing you, and add about four tablespoons of the mixture about two inches in from the nearest point to you. Fold over, tucking the mixture in, and begin rolling. When you have about 3 inches remaining, brush the egg mixture on the top most area, and on the sides. Fold over each side, tighten, then do your final roll. Make sure the roll is sealed by gently rubbing the final roll area, and making sure the egg mixture, or what I call the glue, adheres to the wrapper.
*Hope all those on the East Coast are doing okay after Irene - it was definitely a scary time!
According to court records, juvenile authorities alerted investigators about the situation.
Please contact me through email with your information and I will send you your stamp set and charms.
glitters out of reach
“Dad?” I said in a quavery voice, sounding about 5 years old. “Wake up. I think I blew a fuse.”
Even though Rafael insisted on being held most of the morning, I somehow managed to bake up chocolate cupcakes for an Easter party we've been invited to. The dogs dozed on the sunny couch, and our home felt so bright and cheerful with all the green and pink.
Sideways.
Rolls Royce Wishing on a star
- Abduction all 482 Pokemon (excluding event-only Pokemon)
Just because you believe in some kind of deity, doesn’t make it any more real to someone who doesn’t believe in it, i mean, stop, fucking quit trying to go into the world missionary style, you’re only gonna get yourself fucked over.
Roof rack required: no
I'd love to hear from others that are working on some normal spring cleaning or some big organization projects! Do you ever get overwhelmed with all there is to do? When I do, I just gaze around and think how nice it will look when it is finished! Any tips on ways that I could organize that garage? I'd love to get some advice or suggestions on things to use!
I have something to confess.
A1: No, Mama. I mean I want us to speak it. Not practice it.
This also provides some valuable networking opportunities and if successful, this model is surely to be implemented by other airlines as well. This would create total socialization of flying, which is Facebook profiles sharing flight-specific in-jokes, LinkedIn members meeting up and creating in-air business deals and sharing posts and information on Twitter whilst in transit from Amsterdam to Istanbul.
Kegged and waiting room in the kegerator.
* Please arrive before your session begins so that we can take full advantage of our time together.
Brandon Holstein: At What age did you become involved in the game of football and how quickly did you fall in love with it?
I tell you I want you close to me
1. Lilies have been cultivated for over 3000 years.
What do you think? Am I just being a do-gooder? Am I really missing out on something all that great? And why does it bother people that I have no desire to try this? Am I really that strange of a person? :P
Although the rabbis wouldn’t recognize abortion today, modern Jews rely on ancient and narrow rabbinical strictures to embrace an ideology that allows abortion, not only in life and death situations, but at all points in time during the pregnancy, and for all reasons. I grew up, therefore, in a very abortion-friendly milieu.
In Works and Days Ralph Waldo Emerson writes “Just to fill the hour – that is happiness. Fill my hour, ye gods, so that I shall not say whilst I have done this ‘behold an hour of my life is gone,’ but rather ‘I have lived one hour.’”
With your quick wit, the words you choose at times makes you seem a bit too critical of other people and their opinions. Take care, for you could unintentionally hurt those you love. Wit is an asset when used strictly in a humorous sense, and you’ve been endowed with a finely honed sense of humor that keeps you and yours cheerful.
You put it away, Mama, after you trace my name with your finger. After you smell it. After you say our names together. After you marvel at the issuance date being my due date, and your birthday. After you tell my grandparents. After you cry.
The water, scarce, is rationed here,
Contemporary poets such as Kevin Higgins can gather the new ‘ordinary plenty’ such as the happenings in President Clinton’s trousers and once-avidly-followed television programmes into a poem, ‘Remembering the Nineties’, that comments ironically on media changes experienced since the 90s; Leanne O’Sullivan can write an eloquent collection on the subject of anorexia and teenage anxiety. This is but a small sample of recent concerns. Irish poets are now less concerned with the notion of insularity and more involved in the global – but Irish poetry still has a particular feel to it; a touch of the lyrical that will always out. It is certainly a different kind of anthology that would be needed to showcase all the poetry flowing in Ireland in the present day, and it could be argued that the annual Best of Irish Poetry published by Munster Literature Centre since 06/07 already serves that purpose, or indeed some might look to The Echoing Years (2007) the third in a trilogy of anthologies that combined Irish and Canadian poetry.
Why not engage responsibly with the private rented sector, not a bunch of policy wonks? How many of your people on license have Crisis helped into sustainable private rented sector tenancies which have lasted the duration of the term? Charities such as Crisis and Shelter have a place in effecting research and a framework for good policy and practise but generally, landlords will not engage directly and PRS schemes they have funded have not evidenced sustained success.
Phase 3 – drop the ‘e’ – it can be taken for granted.
In fact, we have seen the people demanding to have their say in governance. The most popularly civil movement referred to are the Hindraf and Bersih rallies in 2007. And lately, Bersih 2.0, Lynas, the Women’s Day Himpunan Ungu, the gatherings to demand for native land rights, mother tongue language, freedom of assembly, the independence of judiciary and others.
Yesterday NABC bottled its first round of Elector. Thanks to everyone who came and helped. The case total for the first day was 74 (12 x 22 oz), which David Pierce says isn't bad for a bunch of first-timers. My knees and back agree with this assessment. Office Hours Barleywines last night helped ease the pain.
Last is the color of beer. The unit of measure, SRM, is an index value that speaks to the intensity of the beer's color. The best way to describe this is by using a picture:
91 ***3. “The Chicago Conspiracy Trial: Disgraceful Masquerade.” Chicago Sun-Times, February
We joked.
Ahmad Fuad said DBKL could use at least four different laws – the Local Government Act 1976; the Local Government (Dataran Merdeka) (Federal Territory of Kuala Lumpur) By-Laws 1992; Street, Drainage, and Building Act 1974; and even the Penal Code if anyone obstructs the officers from carrying out their duties.
Anyway, enough with the gibber-gabber and on to the reason for this post!!! HOLIDAY SHOPPING!!!! I've put together (what I believe to be) some pretty awesome gift baskets.
Well, it could, you think to yourself, if your best friends from home were here too. You wonder what they’re up to right now. Dad would have found the building really interesting and Mum, well Mum would have definitely laughed when she heard what your crazy neighbour said this morning about… oh, what was it? You don’t even remember anymore, it was hilarious at the time though, just like when you all took that family trip to…
“I will come back to the same thing again and again. I’m afraid that Malaysians won’t do their bit.
But I hope I’m not offending anyone, because that’s just me and how I see things.
vitamins, minerals and enzymes that are essential for your health
We are leaving on Sunday for a week to go look for our new house. I am super excited about it except for the part about flying with 2 small kids, or the almost 2 hour drive from the airport to the hotel, or staying in a hotel for a week, or the packing OH THE PACKING! I do not like packing. I believe I have myself and the children packed and ready, my husband is on his own. I tried to get most of it done when my kids were sleeping but that doesn’t always work. Like I said before I spend some quality time with them, then allow them to play alone so I can jam as much crap into a suitcase as I can as fast as possible.
Just a quick note then I'm off to bed. It's been a busy day but most of that was before work. Did alot of running around and was almost late. I hate being late. That sort of made me grouchy.
Now that I’ve got that all out, I have nothing else to say! So let me show you another image and then I’ll wrap up this post.
I also have not been wearing the emigi from the specified time frames. It needs to be in at 1800 until the end of the day. I asked Him where it was at the other day.
Joe Simon, co-creator of such characters as Captain America, the Golden Age Sandman AND Silver Age Sandman, the Fly, Fighting American, and hundreds more, has died at age 98, according to his son’s posting on Facebook. He was 98, having just celebrated his birthday this past October.
Just as Tyger Woods was probably relieved when Jessie James got outed for cheating on Sandra, I am sure Jessie James is relieved that Schwartznegger is now in the media spotlight for his indiscretions.
Mich Porter (again straight out the bottle) went pretty well with the BBQ chicken. It has roasted malt and coffee flavor, but it has some kind of musty hops thing going on. Normally I wouldn't mind (probably a german hop), but it did linger just a touch. The body was great for tailgating, as it was not too thick. I had a couple of these before the game. I was a little sluggish during the game and at first I'm thinking it was because of the higher alcohol porter, but I later figure my body was still working on the beer from Dontoberfest.
Members of the People’s Assembly shall enjoy immunity for the mandate duration of the Assembly. Criminal proceedings against any member of them shall be taken after having a prior permission from the Assembly unless caught in the act. In non-session cases, permission shall be taken from the Assembly’s office, and the Assembly shall be notified by any action taken at its first meeting.
Yes, it's been a while....a long while.
Go to!" say the children,---"Up in Heaven,
